













About Us – New Media Investment Group

































































Home
About
Markets
Commercial Services
Investor Relations
Contact












About Us






















New Media Investment Group Inc. (NYSE:NEWM) is focused primarily on investing in a high quality, diversified portfolio of local media assets, and on growing our digital initiatives such as ThriveHive, a digital marketing services business.
Our print and online products focus on the local community, primarily covering topics such as local news, politics, community and regional events, youth sports, and local schools. As a result of our focus on small and midsize markets, we are usually the primary or sole provider of comprehensive and in-depth local market news and information in the communities we serve.
85% of our daily newspapers have been published for more than 100 years and 100% have been published for more than 50 years. Our strategy is to acquire and operate traditional local media businesses and transform them from print-centric operations to dynamic multi-media operations, through our existing online advertising and digital marketing businesses.
New Media is externally managed and advised by an affiliate of Fortress Investment Group LLC, a global investment management firm.

  Executive Management Board of Directors0Daily Newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 1.5 million
0Weekly Newspapers published up to three times per week, with total paid circulation of approximately 315,443 and total free circulation of approximately 1.9 million
0‘Shoppers’ published up to 4 times per month, with total circulation of approximately 3 million – generally advertising-only publications
0+Local Websites extend our franchises and reach 35 million unique visitors each month









Executive ManagementMichael E. ReedChief Executive OfficerMichael E. Reed is our Chief Executive Officer. He became GateHouse’s Chief Executive Officer in January of 2006. He was a member of the board of directors of GateHouse since October 2006. He was formerly the President and Chief Executive Officer of Community Newspaper Holdings, Inc., or “CNHI,” a leading publisher of local news and information and had served in that capacity since 1999. Mr. Reed served as CNHI’s Chief Financial Officer from 1997 to 1999. Prior to that, he worked for Park Communications, Inc., a multimedia company, located in Ithaca, New York. Mr. Reed formerly served on the Board of Directors for the Newspaper Association of America. He currently serves on the Board of Directors for the Minneapolis Star Tribune, on which he has served since 2009. Mr. Reed formerly served as a director of the Associated Press and Chairman of the Audit Committee for the Associated Press. Mr. Reed was also a member of the Board of Visitors of the University of Alabama’s College of Communication and Information Sciences and was a member of the Grady College Journalism School’s Board of Advisors. Mr. Reed has a deep understanding of our operations, strategy and people, as well as our industry, serving as GateHouse’s Chief Executive Officer for over seven years. He has also served in senior executive capacities with other companies in the newspaper and publishing industries. Mr. Reed also has extensive corporate board experience.

Gregory W. FreibergChief Financial Officer and Chief Accounting OfficerGregory W. Freiberg is our Chief Financial Officer and Chief Accounting Officer. He became New Media’s Chief Financial Officer in January of 2014. He was formerly the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Dex One Corporation, a leading marketing solutions provider and had served in that capacity from September 2011 to April 2013. Prior to that, he served as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of Savvis, Inc. from April 2009 to August 2011, a global leader in cloud and managed solutions. Mr. Freiberg served as Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officer of XO Holdings, Inc. and XO Communications, LLC from April 2006 to March 2009. Mr. Freiberg received his Bachelor of Science in Business Administration from the University of South Dakota, holds a CPA Certificate from the State of Nebraska, and served in the United States Army National Guard from 1986-1995.
Kirk DavisChief Operating OfficerKirk Davis is our Chief Operating Officer and has served as CEO of our operating company, GateHouse Media, since 2014. Mr. Davis joined GateHouse Media in 2006 as the leader of its New England operations and was promoted to President and Chief Operating Officer in 2009. Prior to joining GateHouse, Mr. Davis served as the Chief Executive Officer of Enterprise News Media, LLC. From 1995-2001, Mr. Davis held a variety of positions with Community Newspaper Company, a division of Fidelity Investments, where he served as President from 1998-2001. Previously, Mr. Davis held senior management positions with Ingersoll Publications and Thomson Newspapers. In 2001, Mr. Davis formed Cracked Rock Media, Inc. and began acquiring newspapers in Central Massachusetts. Though he still owns Cracked Rock Media, he has no day-to-day operational involvement. Mr. Davis sits on the boards of the Associated Press and the News Media Alliance. He is a past Chairman of the Board of the Local Media Association and previously served on the board of the Alliance for Audited Media.









Board of DirectorsWesley R. EdensChairman and DirectorMr. Edens is the Chairman of our Board of Directors. He also served as our Chief Executive Officer from inception until February 2007. Mr. Edens is a principal and a Co-Chairman of the Board of Directors of Fortress Investment Group LLC, an affiliate of our manager. Mr. Edens has been a member of the Management Committee of Fortress since co-founding Fortress in May 1998. Mr. Edens is responsible for the private equity and publicly traded alternative investment businesses of Fortress Investment Group LLC.
Prior to co-founding Fortress in 1998, Mr. Edens was a partner and managing director of BlackRock Financial Management Inc., where he headed BlackRock Asset Investors, a private equity fund. In addition, Mr. Edens was formerly a partner and managing director of Lehman Brothers.
Theodore P. JanulisDirectorMr. Janulis has been a member of our Board since January 2014. From January 2014 until June 2016, Mr. Janulis served as the Chief Executive Officer of CRT Greenwich LLC. Prior to that, Mr. Janulis served as Chief Executive Officer of Aurora Bank FSB from September 2008 to January 2013. Before Aurora, he spent 23 years at Lehman Brothers in various senior management roles including Global Head of Mortgage Capital, Global Head of the Investment Management Division, which included Neuberger Berman, and Global Co-Head of Fixed Income. He also served on the firm’s Executive Committee. Mr. Janulis served in these roles within two years prior to Lehman Brothers filing voluntary petitions for relief under the United States Bankruptcy Code on September 8, 2008. Mr. Janulis earned his Master of Business Administration from Columbia University Graduate Business School and A.B. from Harvard College.
Mr. Janulis’ knowledge, skill, expertise and experience, including his extensive senior management experience, his service as Chief Executive Officer of two companies and his significant financial background, as evidenced by his professional and educational history, led our Board to conclude that he should serve as a director.

Michael E. ReedDirectorMichael E. Reed is our Chief Executive Officer. He became GateHouse’s Chief Executive Officer in January of 2006. He was a member of the board of directors of GateHouse since October 2006. He was formerly the President and Chief Executive Officer of Community Newspaper Holdings, Inc., or “CNHI,” a leading publisher of local news and information and had served in that capacity since 1999. Mr. Reed served as CNHI’s Chief Financial Officer from 1997 to 1999. Prior to that, he worked for Park Communications, Inc., a multimedia company, located in Ithaca, New York. Mr. Reed formerly served on the Board of Directors for the Newspaper Association of America. He currently serves on the Board of Directors for the Minneapolis Star Tribune, on which he has served since 2009. Mr. Reed formerly served as a director of the Associated Press and Chairman of the Audit Committee for the Associated Press. Mr. Reed was also a member of the Board of Visitors of the University of Alabama’s College of Communication and Information Sciences and was a member of the Grady College Journalism School’s Board of Advisors. Mr. Reed has a deep understanding of our operations, strategy and people, as well as our industry, serving as GateHouse’s Chief Executive Officer for over seven years. He has also served in senior executive capacities with other companies in the newspaper and publishing industries. Mr. Reed also has extensive corporate board experience.

Kevin SheehanDirectorMr. Sheehan has been a member of our Board since our inception, and was a member of the board of directors of our GateHouse since 2006. Since August 2016, Mr. Sheehan has served as Chief Executive Officer and President and as a director of Scientific Games, located in Las Vegas. From February 2015 through August 2016, Mr. Sheehan taught full time as the John J. Phelan, Jr. Distinguished Visiting Professor of Business at Adelphi University. From 2007 to January 2015, Mr. Sheehan served in various positions at Norwegian Cruise Line, including as the Chief Financial Officer, Chief Executive Officer, and President. Previously, Mr. Sheehan provided consulting services to Cerebrus Capital Management LP (2006-2007) and provided consulting services to Clayton Dubilier & Rice (2005-2006). Prior thereto, Mr. Sheehan was Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Cendant Corporation’s Vehicle Services Division (included responsibility for Avis Rent A Car, Budget Rent A Car, Budget Truck, PHH Fleet Management and Wright Express) from January 2003 until May 2005. From March 2001 until May 2003, Mr. Sheehan served as Chief Financial Officer of Cendant Corporation. From August 1999 to February 2001, Mr. Sheehan was President – Corporate and Business Affairs and Chief Financial Officer of Avis Group Holdings, Inc. and a director of that company from June 1999 until February 2001. From August 2005 to January 2008, Mr. Sheehan served on the faculty of Adelphi University as a Distinguished Visiting Professor – Accounting, Finance and Economics. Mr. Sheehan currently serves on the Boards of Dave & Busters and XOJETS. Mr. Sheehan is a graduate of Hunter College and New York University Graduate School of Business, and is a Certified Public Accountant.
Mr. Sheehan has significant experience in a senior management capacity for large corporations. Specifically, his experience as the Chief Financial Officer of several large corporations provide him with important experience and skills, as well as an understanding of the complexities of our current economic environment. Mr. Sheehan also brings significant financial expertise to our Board.

Laurence TaricaDirectorMr. Tarica has been a member of our Board since January 2014. From March 1991 to December 2014, Mr. Tarica served as President and Chief Operating Officer of Jimlar Corporation (“Jimlar”), a member of the Li and Fung Group. Jimlar was privately held until it was acquired by the Li and Fung Group in 2010. Mr. Tarica joined Jimlar in 1971 and served in leadership roles in sourcing, design, development, sales and marketing. Jimlar is one of the oldest footwear import companies in America. Mr. Tarica also serves on the Board of Directors of D’Addario and Company, a manufacturer of musical instrument accessories, FlyWheel Sports, an indoor cycling brand, and on the Advisory Board of Stuart Levine and Associates, a management consulting firm. Mr. Tarica also serves on the Advisory Board of the New York Mets. Mr. Tarica earned his Bachelor of Science in Economics from the University of Pennsylvania, Wharton School of Business.
Mr. Tarica’s knowledge, skill, expertise and experience, specifically his experiences in a variety of business divisions, including sales and marketing, his development of Jimlar’s digital services and social media strategy and his over 20 years of operational and leadership experience as the President and Chief Operating Officer of Jimlar, led our Board to conclude that he should serve as a director.


















 


Contact Us

New Media
			1345 Avenue of the Americas
			45th Floor
			New York, NY 10105
			212.479.3160
ir@newmediainv.com










Copyright 2016 New Media Investment Group, All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy

















Home
About
Markets
Commercial Services
Investor Relations
Contact

























New Media Investment Group Inc (NEWM.N)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: New Media Investment Group Inc (NEWM.N)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerConsumer Publishing












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				NEWM.N on New York Stock Exchange


				13.35USD
26 Jul 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.36


					            (-2.63%)
					        






Prev Close

$13.71


Open

$13.72




Day's High

$13.81


Day's Low

$13.35




Volume

271,696


Avg. Vol

154,297




52-wk High

$19.88


52-wk Low

$11.87












					Full Description



New Media Investment Group Inc., incorporated on June 18, 2013, is a holding company. The Company owns, operates and invests in local media assets. The Company's segments include Eastern US Publishing, Central US Publishing, Western US Publishing and BridgeTower. It focuses on owning and acquiring local media assets in small to mid-size markets. The Company is a publisher of local newspapers and related publications. As of December 25, 2016, its portfolio of media assets spanned across 538 markets and 36 states. As of December 25, 2016, its products included 631 community print publications, 538 Websites and two yellow page directories. Its directory portfolio includes Surewest Directories located in and around the Sacramento, California area, primarily in Roseville, California. The Roseville directory serves the local Roseville community. It also owns additional directory based in Mt. Shasta, California. Propel is its business services product line with digital products designed for small and midsized businesses (SMBs). Propel's products help an SMB build a presence across digital platforms, help them get found by consumers, help them engage with and grow their customer base. It pulls these products together for the SMB with a customer dashboard, which integrates activity and results for all Propel products.As of December 25, 2016, the Company's other products included 125 daily newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 1.4 million; 314 weekly newspapers (published up to three times per week) with total paid circulation of approximately 315,000 and total free circulation of approximately 1.9 million; 124 shoppers (generally advertising-only publications) with total circulation of approximately three million; 538 locally-focused Websites, which extend its businesses onto the Internet and mobile devices with approximately 224 million page views per month; two yellow page directories with a total distribution of approximately 230,000; 68 business publications, and digital marketing and business services. In addition to its products, the Company also opportunistically produces niche publications that address specific local market interests, such as recreation, sports, healthcare and real estate. It also has a range of local and regional business-oriented publications that provide news and analysis. Its print and online products focus on the local community from a content, advertising and digital marketing perspective.Eastern US PublishingAs of December 25, 2016, the Company's Eastern US Publishing segment operated in six publication group clusters: the New England Publishing Group, Cape Publishing Group, Providence Group, Mid-Atlantic Publishing Group, South Atlantic Publishing Group and Coastal Publishing Group. New England Publishing Group is a community newspaper publisher. It also publishes weekly newspapers. As of December 25, 2016, it served 108 communities in markets across eastern Massachusetts. As of December 25, 2016, it also had over 170 Websites with more than 4.5 million combined monthly visitors in Massachusetts. Cape Publishing Group includes Worcester, Massachusetts, the Cape Cod Media Group, the Southcoast Media Group and the Seacoast Media Group. Providence Publishing Group includes the Providence Journal, the Nantucket Island Media Group, and Norwich, Connecticut.Mid-Atlantic Publishing Group includes the Hudson Valley Media Group, the Pocono Mountains Media Group, Delaware and the Honesdale cluster. South Atlantic Publishing Group includes publications in North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee and Virginia. Coastal Publishing Group includes publications in Florida and Alabama. As of December 25, 2016, the Florida cluster published nine daily newspapers, 10 weekly newspapers and four shoppers. In the northwest Florida panhandle, the Company published two dailies and eight weeklies across a 10-county area stretching from Franklin in the east to Santa Rosa in the west, and north to the state line as of December 25, 2016. As of December 25, 2016, in Alabama, it published two daily publications: The Tuscaloosa News and The Gadsden Times.Central US PublishingThe Company's Central US Publishing segment operates in the states of Illinois, Ohio, New York, Michigan, Delaware, Pennsylvania and West Virginia. As of December 25, 2016, the Company publishes 14 paid daily newspapers, 15 paid weekly newspapers and 16 shopper, which provide coverage across the state. The Journal (Freeport, Illinois) Standard is published Tuesday through Sunday. The newspaper's coverage area includes Caroll, Jo Daviess, Ogle and Stephenson counties. The Journal Standard also publishes a Website journalstandard.com. The Peoria Journal Star is a newspaper distributed in Peoria, Tazewell and Woodford counties. As of December 25, 2016, it was also distributed in an additional approximately 17 surrounding counties. As of December 25, 2016, the Springfield State Journal-Register with a daily paid circulation of 24,059 and a paid Sunday circulation of 32,145 covered the state capital of Illinois.In Columbus, Ohio, its Dispatch Media Group operates a range of print and digital news and information brands. As of December 25, 2016, its brand, Columbus Dispatch, had a daily circulation of over 107,000 and a Sunday circulation of 175,084. As of December 25, 2016, other affiliates of Dispatch Media Group included ThisWeek Community Newspapers (a group of 25 weekly community publications), Columbus Parent, alive!, Propel/DMG (with more than 21 Central Ohio Websites), Columbus Monthly, Columbus CEO, On Target Marketing/TheBAG and other specialty magazine publications, including Columbus Weddings, CityGuide, and Restaurant Guide, and a show division that produces The Columbus Dispatch Home & Garden Show, Columbus Weddings Show and The Fall Home & Garden & Holidayfest in central Ohio.The Ohio cluster is anchored in Canton, Ohio and covers Stark and Tuscarawas counties. As of December 25, 2016, it consisted of three daily newspapers, three weekly publication and a monthly magazine. The Repository is a 37,791 daily newspaper that covers the area of Stark County. The (Dover New Philadelphia) Times Reporter is a 12,745 daily publication located 40 miles south of Canton in Tuscarawas County. The (Massillon) Independent is a 6,886 circulation daily that circulates in western Stark County. The Suburbanite is a 30,000 weekly publication that circulates in the affluent northern Stark county and southern Summit county area. Rounding out The Suburbanite family is the North Canton Suburbanite and Jackson Suburbanite. The Ohio facility also provides commercial print services to the New York Times and various regional publications.As of December 25, 2016, the Utica operations included one daily and one weekly newspapers in Hamilton. As of December 25, 2016, Utica also had Websites with combined monthly visitors of over 340,000. As of December 25, 2016, in New York, the Company operated and owned a combination of 16 publications in Suburban Rochester that span four counties and had a combined circulation of 102,967. As of December 25, 2016, in southwestern New York, its operations are centered around five publications based in Steuben county. As of December 25, 2016, in Michigan, it had six dailies, Adrian, Monroe, Coldwater, Holland, Hillsdale and Sturgis, along with one weekly and seven shoppers. The Michigan Group also publishes various magazines, including Shoreline Magazine and Monroe Magazine. Its Pennsylvania/West Virginia cluster includes dailies in Erie and Waynesboro, Pennsylvania, Keyser and Ripley, West Virginia. As of December 25, 2016, it also had two weeklies in Ripley and a commercial printing operation in Ravenswood, West Virginia.Western US PublishingThe Company's Western US Publishing segment operates in the states of Missouri, Arkansas, Texas, California, Kansas, Iowa, Louisiana, Minnesota, Oklahoma, Colorado, Nebraska, Oregon and North Dakota. As of December 25, 2016, it operated six daily newspapers, four weekly newspapers and five shoppers in Missouri. It served the Lake of the Ozarks area with its three daily newspapers, six weekly newspapers and three shoppers as of December 25, 2016. As of December 25, 2016, its Joplin cluster had three daily and seven weekly newspapers and four shoppers. As of December 25, 2016, its Kansas City cluster included eight publications (two daily and four weekly newspapers and two shoppers) located in the eastern Kansas city of Leavenworth and in Independence, Missouri. As of December 25, 2016, the Wichita cluster consisted of two dailies, five weeklies and three shoppers in the towns of El Dorado, Pratt, Wellington, Newton and McPherson near Wichita, Kansas. As of December 25, 2016, its operation in the state of Texas had 27 publications (four daily, nine weekly newspapers and thirteen shoppers). As of December 25, 2016, the group based in Texas consisted of two distinct operations. The first is a collection of small-market dailies and companion publications in central Texas in the towns of Stephenville, Brownwood and Waxahachie. The second is a shopper group serving the growing cities of the Rio Grande Valley in south Texas. These shoppers serve Brownville, Harlingen, Laredo, McAllen, Alice and Corpus Christi, Texas. The Herald Democrat principally serves Grayson county, Texas. The Herald Democrat has a digital platform with their Website, heralddemocrat.com. The Herald Democrat also published three weekly newspapers and four shoppers as of December 25, 2016.In Louisiana, the Company has an operating cluster in the southwestern part of the state, located between Lake Charles and Alexandria. As of December 25, 2016, this cluster consisted of three publications located in the cities of Leesville and DeRidder. As of December 25, 2016, its Baton Rouge cluster consisted of three dailies, four weeklies and three shoppers in the southeastern Louisiana cities of Houma, Thibodaoux, Donaldsonville, Gonzales and Plaquemine. The Southwest Times-Record was the news source in Northwest Arkansas with a daily circulation of 21,125 as of December 25, 2016. The Southwest Times Record digital platform extends the newspaper's reach to consumers around the country through its Website, swtimes.com. As of December 25, 2016, the Southwest Times Record also published six weekly newspapers and a shopper and principally served Sebastian and Crawford counties in Arkansas and Le Flore and Sequoyah counties in Oklahoma with the metropolitan area served being Fort Smith, Arkansas. The Pine Bluff Commercial is a newspaper that serves the Central and Southeast Arkansas. The Examiner-Enterprise is a daily newspaper that publishes a weekly newspaper and a shopper. In the southern area, it operated in the Victorville, Barstow, Ridgecrest and Taft areas with three dailies, two shoppers and two weeklies, as of December 25, 2016. In the Northern area, it operated one daily newspaper in Yreka, four paid weekly papers in Dunsmuir, Mt. Shasta, Weed and Gridley, and two shoppers in Gridley and Mt. Shasta, as of December 25, 2016. In the Stockton, California area, it published one paid daily, one free weekly paper and two shoppers, as of December 25, 2016.As of December 25, 2016, in Oregon, it published two paid daily papers and one shopper. Its publication include the Medford Mail Tribune and the Ashland Daily Tidings. Its weekly agricultural newspaper is The Ag Journal. It also has clusters in and around Grand Forks, North Dakota (home to the Grand Forks Air Force Base and the University of North Dakota) and Iowa. As of December 25, 2016, the Company was represented in southwestern Minnesota through seven paid weekly newspapers and three shoppers. As of December 25, 2016, the Ames Tribune was a newspaper with a daily circulation of 7,011. The Ames Tribune's digital platform allows customers, both local and nationally, to access content through its Website, amestrib.com. As of December 25, 2016, Ames Tribune also published five weekly newspapers and four shoppers.BridgeTowerThe Company's BridgeTower segment comprises local and regional business-oriented publications, Websites, databases, live events, virtual events, thought leadership programs and research, operating in three main clusters: the Business Group, Legal Group and Best Companies Group (BCG). As of December 25, 2016, BridgeTower served over 60,000 paid, engaged subscribers and reached more than 250,000 readers across its publications and e-newsletters. Business Group is an owner of business journals in the United States, producing several daily, weekly, biweekly and monthly publications, as well as data products, Webinars and live events. Its business brands provide news and analysis for the business, construction, retail and real estate communities. In addition to digital and print advertising, the Business Group offers paid subscription products, live events and thought leadership programs. The Business Group includes publications, such as The Journal Record; City Business; Daily Journal of Commerce; Idaho Business Review; Long Island Business News; The Daily Reporter; NJBiz; Pet Age; Finance & Commerce; Lehigh Valley Business; Central Penn Business Journal; Central Penn Parent, Rochester Business Journal, and Daily Journal of Commerce.Legal Group is an operator of regionally-focused legal publications in the United States., producing various daily, weekly and monthly publications, as well as data products, Webinars and live events. The Legal Group provides news, analysis and legal opinions for lawyers, judges and legislators. In addition to paid subscriptions, digital and print advertising, the Legal Group offers events, Webinars and legislative alert services. The Legal Group includes publications, such as Massachusetts Lawyers Weekly; Rhode Island Lawyers Weekly; Wisconsin Law Journal; Missouri Lawyers Weekly; North Carolina Lawyers Weekly; South Carolina Lawyers Weekly; Minnesota Lawyer; Michigan Lawyers Weekly; Virginia Lawyers Weekly; Arizona Capitol Times, and The Daily Record. BCG is BridgeTower's research unit and produces Best Places to Work data in markets and industry categories across the globe, with programs in the United States, the United Kingdom, Canada and North Africa. BCG collects data from employers and employees of its client companies and then analyzes that information to assess employee engagement. BCG also conducts custom research projects within industries, such as automotive, banking and healthcare.The Company competes with the Boston Globe, boston.com, Gannett Company, Inc., 21st Century Media, Inc., Edward Sherman Company, Sun Publishing Company, RISN Operations, Inc., Tribune Publishing, The Observer Group, Hometown News, McClatchy, Sun Coast Media Group, Advance Local, Lee Enterprises, Gannett Company, Inc., Times-Shamrock Company, Community Newspaper Holdings, Inc., Ogden-Nutting, The Advocate, The American Press, The Joplin Globe, Wichita Eagle, The Dallas Morning News, Northwest Arkansas Democrat-Gazette, Des Moines Register, The Sacramento Bee, Modesto Bee, Lodi News Sentine, Advance Publications Inc., Pet Business and Pet Product News.

» Full Overview of NEWM.N







					Company Address



New Media Investment Group Inc
1345 Avenue of the AmericasNEW YORK   NY   10105-0302
P: +1212.4795312F: +1302.6365454







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Wesley Edens

--




							 Michael Reed

--




							 Gregory Freiberg

--




							 Kirk Davis

2,104,210




							 Theodore Janulis

--




» More Officers & Directors





					New Media Investment Group Inc News




BRIEF-New Media to acquire Calkins Media for $17.5 million

Jun 19 2017 
BRIEF-New Media announces authorization of share repurchase program

May 17 2017 
BRIEF-New Media qtrly loss per share $0.07

Apr 27 2017 
BRIEF-New Media Investment Group posts Q4 earnings per share $0.31

Feb 21 2017 

» More NEWM.N  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerConsumer Publishing






















New Media Investment Group Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 27, 2017 5:38 AM ET
Media

Company Overview of New Media Investment Group Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
New Media Investment Group Inc. invests in, owns, and operates local media assets in the United States. The company’s principal products include 125 daily newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 1.4 million; 314 weekly newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 315,000 and total free circulation of approximately 1.9 million; 124 shoppers with total circulation of approximately 3.0 million; and 538 locally-focused Websites, including Internet and mobile devices with approximately 224 million page views per month. Its principal products also comprise 2 yellow page directories with a total distribution of approximately 230,000 that cover a population of approximatel...
New Media Investment Group Inc. invests in, owns, and operates local media assets in the United States. The company’s principal products include 125 daily newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 1.4 million; 314 weekly newspapers with total paid circulation of approximately 315,000 and total free circulation of approximately 1.9 million; 124 shoppers with total circulation of approximately 3.0 million; and 538 locally-focused Websites, including Internet and mobile devices with approximately 224 million page views per month. Its principal products also comprise 2 yellow page directories with a total distribution of approximately 230,000 that cover a population of approximately 411,000 people; 68 business publications; and Propel digital marketing and business services. In addition, the company produces niche publications that address specific local market interests, such as recreation, sports, healthcare, and real estate. Further, it provides print and online products that offer local market news and information on various topics comprising local news and politics, community and regional events, youth sports, opinion and editorial pages, local schools, obituaries, weddings, and police reports, as well as print and digital advertising products, as well as commercial printing and regional business-oriented publications services. The company reaches approximately 20 million people per week; and serves approximately 220,000 business customers. New Media Investment Group Inc. was founded in 1997 and is based in New York, New York.
Detailed Description


1345 Avenue of the Americas45th FloorNew York, NY 10105United StatesFounded in 199710,115 Employees



Phone: 212-479-3160

www.newmediainv.com







Key Executives for New Media Investment Group Inc.




Mr. Kirk A. Davis


      	Chief Operating Officer and Chief Executive Officer of Gatehouse Media LLC
      


Age: 55
        

Total Annual Compensation: $1.1M





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016. 

New Media Investment Group Inc. Key Developments

New Media Investment Group Seeks Acquisitions 
May 27 17
"We believe our current stock price is at a significant discount to the intrinsic value of our company. We continue to firmly believe in our cash flows that support the dividend, our growth prospects, including our acquisition pipeline, and our long term strategy," New Media Investment Group Inc. (NYSE:NEWM) Chief Executive Officer Michael E. Reed said.



New Media Investment Group Inc. Presents at Stephens 2017 Spring Investment Conference, Jun-06-2017 03:00 PM
May 23 17
New Media Investment Group Inc. Presents at Stephens 2017 Spring Investment Conference, Jun-06-2017 03:00 PM. Venue: Lotte New York Palace Hotel, 455 Madison Avenue, New York, New York, United States.


New Media Investment Group Inc. Reports Unaudited Consolidated Earnings Results for the First Quarter Ended March 26, 2017; Reports Impairment of Long-Term Assets for the First Quarter Ended March 26, 2017; Declares First Quarter 2017 Cash Dividend Payable on May 18, 2017
Apr 27 17
New Media Investment Group Inc. reported unaudited consolidated earnings results for the first quarter ended March 26, 2017. For the period, the company reported total revenues of $307,524,000 up 2.2% to the prior year on a reported basis and a decrease of 6.2% on an organic same-store basis against $300,104,000 for the same period a year ago. Operating loss was $2,845,000, negatively impacted by $6.5 million of non-cash asset write downs for print facility consolidation, against operating income of $7,030,000 for the same period a year ago. Loss before income taxes was $10,016,000 against $160,000 for the same period a year ago. Net loss was $3,685,000 or $0.07 per basic and diluted share also impacted by the write downs for print facility consolidation, against net income of $4,967,000 or $0.11 per basic and diluted share for the same period a year ago. Net cash provided by operating activities was $18,248,000 against $9,828,000 for the same period a year ago. Net capital expenditures were $2,400,000 against $2,588,000 for the same period a year ago. Adjusted EBITDA from continuing operations was $21,291,000 against $23,285,000 for the same period a year ago. Adjusted EBITDA was $26,689,000 against $29,095,000 for the same period a year ago. Free cash flow was $17,191,000 against $18,619,000 a decrease of $2.4 million and $1.4 million, respectively to the prior year. 
 
Impairment of long-term assets was $6,485,000 for the first quarter of 2017.

Board of Directors declared a first quarter 2017 cash dividend of $0.35 per share of common stock. The dividend is payable on May 18, 2017 to shareholders of record as of the close of business on May 10, 2017.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 "It" Girl Public Relations United States +SmithGifford, Inc. United States .TV Technologies, Inc. United States @International Services, Inc. United States 1 Chronicles 14, L.P. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Merger/Acquisition

			      June 19, 2017
			    
Calkins Media Incorporated



Merger/Acquisition

			      June 9, 2017
			    
Wanderful Media, LLC



Buyback

			      May 17, 2017
			    
--





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact New Media Investment Group Inc., please visit www.newmediainv.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close


































New Media Investment Group Inc. - NEWM - Stock Price Today - Zacks






























Quote Overview


Stock Activity



Open
13.72


Day Low
13.35


Day High
13.82


52 Wk Low
11.87


52 Wk High
19.89


Avg. Volume
278,602


Market Cap
735.05 M


Dividend
1.40 ( 10.21%)


Beta
1.27





Key Earnings Data



Earnings ESP 
0.00%


Most Accurate Est
NA


Current Qtr Est
NA


Current Yr Est
0.88


Exp Earnings Date
*BMO7/27/17


Prior Year EPS
0.70


Exp EPS Growth (3-5yr)NA


Forward PE
15.58


PEG Ratio
NA













Consumer Staples » Publishing - Newspapers



*BMO = Before Market Open *AMC = After Market Close


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find earnings surprises by focusing on the most recent analyst revisions. This is done because, generally speaking, if an analyst reevaluates their earnings estimate right before an earnings release, it means that they have fresh information which could potentially be more accurate than what analysts thought about a company two or three months ago.
The crux of this approach is comparing the Most Accurate Estimate to the Zacks Consensus Estimate, although the Zacks Rank is also an important feature of the ESP metric. Combining these two can help investors find stocks that are ready to beat the consensus at their next report, and hopefully surge higher in price too.
In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time. And best of all, by using these parameters, investors have seen 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings





Research Report for NEWM



All Zacks’ Analyst Reports



Premium Research for NEWM





Zacks Rank


 Hold 3



Zacks Industry Rank
 Top 48%(128 out of 265)


Zacks Sector Rank
 Top 19% (3  out of 16) 



Style Scores

A Value | C Growth | F Momentum | B VGM




Earnings ESP


0.00%



Research Report for NEWM

Snapshot





This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to get access to the Zacks Rank


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports


Zacks Earnings ESP (Expected Surprise Prediction) looks to find companies that have recently seen positive earnings estimate revision activity. The idea is that more recent information is, generally speaking, more accurate and can be a better predictor of the future, which can give investors an advantage in earnings season.
The technique has proven to be very useful for finding positive surprises. In fact, when combining a Zacks Rank #3 or better and a positive Earnings ESP, stocks produced a positive surprise 70% of the time, while they also saw 28.3% annual returns on average, according to our 10 year backtest.
    
Visit the Earnings ESP Center
See the Full List of Stocks To Beat Earnings


This is our short term rating system that serves as a timeliness indicator for stocks over the next 1 to 3 months. How good is it? See rankings and related performance below. 



Zacks Rank
Definition
Annualized Return




1
Strong Buy
25.71%


2
Buy
18.12%


3
Hold
9.91%


4
Sell
5.49%


5
Strong Sell
2.29%


S&P
500
9.79%



Zacks Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Rank
Zacks Rank Home - All Zacks Rank resources in one place
Zacks Premium - The only way to fully access the Zacks Rank


The Zacks Industry Rank assigns a rating to each of the 265 X (Expanded) Industries based on their average Zacks Rank.
An industry with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
The industry with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top industry (1 out of 265), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Industries. The industry with the worst average Zacks Rank (265 out of 265) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank  
Zacks Industry Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Industry Rank



The Zacks Sector Rank assigns a rating to each of the 16 Sectors based on their average Zacks Rank.
A sector with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #1's and #2's will have a better average Zacks Rank than one with a larger percentage of Zacks Rank #4's and #5's.
Zacks Sector Rank Education - Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank 
The sector with the best average Zacks Rank would be considered the top sector (1 out of 16), which would place it in the top 1% of Zacks Ranked Sectors. The sector with the worst average Zacks Rank (16 out of 16) would place in the bottom 1%.
Zacks Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Rank 
Zacks Sector Rank Education -- Learn more about the Zacks Sector Rank



The Style Scores are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style. 
The three scores are based on the trading styles of Growth, Value, and Momentum.


Growth Score
A


Value Score
A


Momentum Score
A


Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Style Scores  are a complementary set of indicators to use alongside the Zacks Rank. It allows the user to better focus on the stocks that are the best fit for his or her personal trading style.
The scores are based on the trading styles of Value, Growth, and Momentum. There's also a VGM Score ('V' for Value, 'G' for Growth and 'M' for Momentum), which combines the weighted average of the individual style scores into one score.



Value Score
A


Growth Score
A


Momentum Score
A


VGM Score
A



Within each Score, stocks are graded into five groups: A, B, C, D and F. As you might remember from your school days, an A, is better than a B; a B is better than a C; a C is better than a D; and a D is better than an F.
As an investor, you want to buy stocks with the highest probability of success. That means you want to buy stocks with a Zacks Rank #1 or #2, Strong Buy or Buy, which also has a Score of an A or a B in your personal trading style.
Zacks Style Scores Education - Learn more about the Zacks Style Scores


The Zacks Equity Research reports, or ZER for short, are our in-house, independently produced research reports.
The ever popular one-page Snapshot reports are generated for virtually every single Zacks Ranked stock. It's packed with all of the company's key stats and salient decision making information. Including the Zacks Rank, Zacks Industry Rank, Style Scores, the Price, Consensus & Surprise chart, graphical estimate analysis and how a stocks stacks up to its peers.
The detailed multi-page Analyst report does an even deeper dive on the company's vital statistics. In addition to all of the proprietary analysis in the Snapshot, the report also visually displays the four components of the Zacks Rank (Agreement, Magnitude, Upside and Surprise); provides a comprehensive overview of the company business drivers, complete with earnings and sales charts; a recap of their last earnings report; and a bulleted list of reasons to buy or sell the stock. It also includes an industry comparison table to see how your stock compares to its expanded industry, and the S&P 500.
Researching stocks has never been so easy or insightful as with the ZER Analyst and Snapshot reports.
Learn more about Zacks Equity Research reports
See more Zacks Equity Research reports

(  = Change in last 30 days) 
View All Zacks Rank #1 Strong Buys





Premium Research: Industry Analysis



Top Peers
Symbol
Zacks Rank




New Media Investment Group Inc.
NEWM



Gannett Co., Inc.
GCI



Lee Enterprises, Incorporated
LEE



McClatchy Company (The)
MNI



New York Times Company (The)
NYT



tronc, Inc.
TRNC



A.H. Belo Corporation
AHC
NA



See all Publishing - Newspapers Peers


 




Zacks News for NEWM

NY Times' Strategies Well on Track: Stock Up 20% in 3 Months
07/11/17-8:19AM EST  Zacks

How NY Times (NYT) is Countering Soft Advertising Demand
06/26/17-8:09AM EST  Zacks

NEWM: What are Zacks experts saying now?

Zacks Private Portfolio Services

Will Strategic Efforts Lead Publishing Stocks to Growth?
06/20/17-12:00AM EST  Zacks

Publishing Industry Stock Outlook - June 2017
06/19/17-12:00AM EST  Zacks

NY Times Banks on Strategic Plans, Ad Revenue a Concern
05/18/17-7:23AM EST  Zacks




Company Summary
New Media Investment Group, Inc. is an online advertising and digital marketing company. The company's core products include daily newspapers; weekly newspapers; locally focused Websites; mobile sites and yellow page directories. Its print and online products provide local market news and information that covers various topics, such as local news and politics, community and regional events, youth sports, opinion and editorial pages, and local schools. It also invests in diversified portfolio of local media assets. New Media Investment Group Inc. is based in New York.   





 









New Media Investment Group Inc. Reviews (0 Reviews) - New Media Investment Group Inc. Community Feedback Score: 0.00 - Jul 2017








































Register Your Business
Sign In







What We Rank 


Services

Web Design

Web Design
3D Illustration and Anim..
3D Web Design 
Infographic Design
Logo Design
Responsive Web Design
UI Design
Web Design



Web Development

Web Development
Android App Development
ASP.Net Development
CakePHP Development
Django Development
Drupal Development
E-Commerce Development
Game Development
iPhone App Development
Joomla Development
Magento Solutions
Mobile App Development
Mobile Website Developme..
osCommerce Development
PHP Development
Ruby on Rails Developmen..
Site Audit
Symfony Development
Web Development
Web Strategy
WordPress Development



Web Hosting

Web Hosting
ASP.NET Hosting
CDN Networks
Cloud Storage
Cloud VPS
Colocation Services
CPanel Hosting
Dedicated Hosting
Drupal Hosting
eCommerce Hosting
Email Hosting
Green Web Hosting
International Hosting
Joomla Hosting
Linux Dedicated Server
Linux Hosting
Linux VPS
Managed Dedicated Hostin..
PCI Compliant Hosting
PHP Hosting
Plesk Hosting Companies
Reseller Hosting
VPS Hosting
Web Hosting
Windows Dedicated Server
Windows Hosting Companie..
Windows VPS
WordPress Hosting



Digital Marketing

Digital Marketing
Affiliate Marketing
Content Marketing
Contextual Advertising
Conversion Optimization
Digital Marketing
Landing Page Optimizatio..
Link Building
Link Removal
Local SEO
Mobile App Marketing
Mobile Marketing
Mobile SEO
Multilingual SEO
PPC
Reputation Management
SEO
SEO Training
Social Media Marketing
Video SEO



Public Relations

Public Relations
Celebrity PR
CEO / Executive Position..
Crisis Communications
CSR / Corporate Conscien..
Investor Relations
Litigation Communication..
Media Training
Multi-Cultural Engagemen..
Public Relations



Merchant Services

Merchant Services
ACH Processing Companies
Equipment Leasing Compan..
Gift & Loyalty Card Prog..
Merchant Cash Advance Co..
Payment Gateway Provider..
POS Systems
Small Business Loans




Software

Business Software

Business Software
Citation Management Soft..
Competitive Intelligence..
Donation Management Soft..
Dry Cleaning Software
EDI Software
EHS Management Software
Electronic Discovery Sof..
Enterprise Asset Managem..
Expense Report Software
Food Delivery Software
Franchise Management Sof..
Fundraising Software
Funeral Home Software
Gamification Software
Horse Software
Inspection Software
Kennel Management Softwa..
Library Automation Softw..
Maid Service Software
Martial Arts Software
Membership Management So..
Museum Software
Order Entry Software
Order Management Softwar..
Pest Control Software
Pet Grooming Software
Pet Sitting Software
Photography Studio Softw..



Government Software

Government Software
Government Software
Investigation Management..
Jail Management Software
Parking Management Softw..
Parks and Recreation Sof..
Political Campaign Manag..
Public Transportation So..
Public Works Software



Human Resource Software

Human Resource Software
Applicant Tracking Softw..
Benefits Administration ..
Compensation Management ..
Employee Engagement Soft..
Employee Evaluation Soft..
Employee Recognition Sof..
Employee Scheduling Soft..
Employee Training Softwa..
HRMS Software
Human Resource Software
Job Board Software
Learning Management Soft..
Online HR Software
Payroll Software
Recruiting Software
Talent Management Softwa..
Time Tracking Software
Video Interviewing Softw..
Workforce Management Sof..



Medical Software

Medical Software
Assisted Living Software
Clinical Trial Managemen..
Dental Practice Manageme..
EMS Software
Home Care Software
Home Healthcare Software
Long-Term Care Software



Real Estate Software

Real Estate Software
Architecture Software
Building Maintenance Sof..
Community Management Sof..
Consignment Software
Garden Center Software
HOA Software
HVAC Management Software
Lease Management Softwar..
Real Estate Agency Softw..
Real Estate CRM Software
Real Estate Property Man..
Rental Software
Vacation Rental Software



Manufacturing Software

Manufacturing Software
CPQ Software
Discrete Manufacturing S..
Engineer-to-Order Manufa..
Inventory Management Sof..
Manufacturing Execution ..
MRP Software
Process Manufacturing So..
Product Lifecycle Manage..
Production Planning Soft..
Quality Management Softw..
Recycling Software
Small Business Manufactu..
SPC Software
Wireframe Software




 
How Do We Rank




 




 
Argentina 

 
Australia 

 
Bangladesh 

 
Belarus 

 
Belgium 

 
Brazil 

 
Bulgaria 

 
Canada 

 
China 

 
Costa Rica 

 
Egypt 

 
France 

 
Germany 

 
Hong Kong 

 
India 

 
Indonesia 

 
Ireland 

 
Israel 

 
Italy 

 
Japan 

 
Kenya 

 
Malaysia 

 
Mexico 

 
Netherlands 

 
New Zealand 

 
Pakistan 

 
Philippines 

 
Poland 

 
Qatar 

 
Romania 

 
Russia 

 
Saudi Arabia 

 
Singapore 

 
South Africa 

 
Spain 

 
Sri Lanka 

 
Sweden 

 
Switzerland 

 
Thailand 

 
Turkey 

 
UAE 

 
Ukraine 

 
United Kingdom 

 
United States 

















 



Search for a Category or Company



 

Best

companies
in

 







 









 









 



New Media Investment Group Inc.


COMMUNITY FEEDBACK SCORE
 0.00
0 Reviews







Request A Quote 


Contact Vendor









Home
Reviews on New Media Investment Group Inc.
 





 
New Media Investment Group Inc. 
Request A Quote 
Contact Vendor



COMMUNITY FEEDBACK SCORE  
0.00
0 Reviews








RANKINGS & RATINGS
RANK



ABOUT NEW MEDIA INVESTMENT GROUP INC. 
New Media Investment Group Inc. Representatives: We attract thousands of visitors to our website daily. Our visitors would benefit substantially from an accurate description of New Media Investment Group Inc.. To learn more about us and manage and complete your brand description, please click here.



Work forNew Media Investment Group Inc.? Claim Profile 

Invite your clients to leave reviews Claim Now 
 



Reviews 

Pricing 

Competitors & Ratings 

Faqs 

Company Info 






Most helpful positive review
There are no positive reviews on New Media Investment Group Inc.




Most helpful critical review
There are no negative reviews on New Media Investment Group Inc..






REVIEWS 0

POSITIVE 0%
0 Reviews


NEGATIVE 0%
0 Reviews


NEUTRAL 0%
0 Reviews





WRITE YOUR REVIEW 

RECORD YOUR REVIEW 









×

 






×

 






×

 







Have a comment, question, or want to share something with us? 


Feedback or Questions? 






×

Submit Feedback to CrowdReviews.com






Name:



 

Email Address:



 
 



Subject:



 
 



Comments:



 
 






 

 








Report a Concern 






×

Report a Concern to CrowdReviews.com






Name:



 

Email Address:



 
 



Subject:



 
 



Reports:



 
 






 

 








Support Helpdesk800-256-5813 


Priority Business Support
priority@crowdreviews.com












About

About CrowdReviews
Newsroom
Partners
Conferences & Events
Scholarship Program
Investor Relations
Contact Us



FAQs

How Do We Rank
Who Do We Rank
Why Do We Rank
How Do We Make Money
How We Are Transparent
Algorithm Updates



Resources

Register Your Business
Claim Your Profile
Submit A Review
Download Badge
Directory
Our Blog
Advertise



Coverage Areas

Services for BusinessesServices for ConsumersSoftware 





STAY IN TOUCH

    
Subscribe to our newsletter.














©2017 CROWDREVIEWS.COM, LLC. All Rights Reserved. 



PRIVACY POLICY TERMS OF USE 







×

Claim a Profile on CrowdReviews.com
ENHANCE YOUR PROFILE
Claim and update your profile to ensure potential customers get the best impression on what you have to offer.



Search For a Company







 Searching for more matching results...









×

Leave A Review on CrowdReviews.com
YOUR REVIEWS MATTER
CrowdReviews.com relies on user reviews and ratings in order to help buyers find the best products and services for them. We take reviews that are attached to a LinkedIn account much more seriously and consider them as legitimate user reviews.



Search For a Company







 Searching for more matching results...









×



Sign In CrowdReviews.com
MANAGE YOUR BUSINESS PROFILE
To manage your company profile on CrowdReviews.com, please enter your login credentials below.



 











By signing in, you agree to CrowdReviews Terms of Use and Privacy Policy.
Forgot Password? 

SIGN IN 
 


 



 

RESET PASSWORD 

Remember your password? Login here.











×





REGISTER
Sign up your business.


Reviews are a big part in the buyer decision making process. Get signed up within minutes.

Get more customers
Get ranked on an even playing field
Get leads. Pick up new clients.
Get recognized for excellence.






 
 
 





Company Name:



 

Company Website:



 

Email Address:



 

Phone Number:



 

Contact Person:



 

Register As:

Service
Software

 




 

 











×

 






×

 






×

 






×

 







×



CONFIRM YOUR IDENTITY
CrowdReviews.com relies on user reviews and ratings in order to help buyers find the best products and services for them. We take reviews that are attached to a LinkedIn account much more seriously and consider them as legitimate user reviews.


Confirm identity with LinkedIn


OR


If you wish to remain anonymous, click here. 






























New Media Investment Group Inc - NYSE:NEWM - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















New Media Investment Group Inc (NEWM)
Follow




                                13.35
                            







                        NYSE : Services
                    

Jul 26, 2017 4:03 PM EDT












Prev Close
  13.35


Day Low/High

                                    0.00 /
                                    0.00


52 Wk Low/High

                                    11.87 /
                                    19.89
                                


Avg Volume 
400.70K











Exchange
NYSE


Shares Outstanding
53.61M


Market Cap
735.05M


EPS
0.70


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            26.37
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            1.40
                                            (10.20%)

                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News









Megaclustering Is Coming for Your Daily Newspaper











Denise Robbins, SVP Consumer Marketing, GateHouse Media

















New Media Schedules Second Quarter Results And Dividend Announcement
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company")(NYSE:NEWM) announced today that it will release its second quarter financial results and dividend for the second quarter on Thursday, July 27, 2017, prior to...

Jul 6, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









New Media Announces Rebranding Of Propel Business Services, Changes Name To UpCurve
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM) announced today that its small and medium-sized business (SMB) solutions provider, formerly known as Propel Business Services, has been rebranded as...

Jun 26, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









New Media Announces Agreement To Acquire Calkins Media Incorporated For $17.5 Million
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM), one of the largest publishers of locally based print and online media in the United States as measured by number of publications, announced today...

Jun 19, 2017 6:50 AM EDT









This Stock Has A 11.06% Yield And Sells For Less Than Book
New Media Investment Group Inc has been named as a Top 25 dividend stock, according the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among the coverage universe, NEWM shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Jun 7, 2017 8:03 AM EDT









This Stock Has A 11.10% Yield, Sells For Less Than Book, and Insiders Have Been Buying
In this series, we look through the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report, and then we cherry pick only those companies that have experienced insider buying within the past six months. The officers and directors of a company tend to have a unique insider's view of the business, and presumably the only reason an insider would choose to take their hard-earned cash and use it to buy stock in the open market, is that they expect to make money — maybe they find the stock very undervalued, or maybe they see exciting progress within the company, or maybe both.

Jun 6, 2017 3:59 PM EDT









NEWM: Insiders vs. Shorts
The most recent short interest data was recently released for the 05/15/2017 settlement date, and New Media Investment Group Inc is one of the most shorted stocks of the Russell 3000, based on 6.80 "days to cover" versus the median component at 4.71. There are a number of ways to look at short data, but one metric that we find particularly useful is the "days to cover" because it considers both the total shares short and the average daily volume of shares typically traded.

May 30, 2017 2:17 PM EDT









New Media Announces Authorization Of Share Repurchase Program
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE: NEWM) announced today that the Company's Board of Directors authorized the repurchase of up to $100 million of the Company's common stock over the next 12...

May 17, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









New Media Investment Group Enters Oversold Territory
The DividendRank formula at Dividend Channel ranks a coverage universe of thousands of dividend stocks, according to a proprietary formula designed to identify those stocks that combine two important characteristics — strong fundamentals and a valuation that looks inexpensive. New Media Investment Group Inc presently has a stellar rank, in the top 10% of the coverage universe, which suggests it is among the top most "interesting" ideas that merit further research by investors.

May 17, 2017 4:01 PM EDT









New Media Investment Group: A 10.0% Better Bargain Than When Reed Bought
There's an old saying on Wall Street about insider buying: there are many possible reasons to sell a stock, but only one reason to buy. Back on May 1, New Media Investment Group Inc's Chief Executive Officer, Michael Reed, invested $530,000.00 into 40,000 shares of NEWM, for a cost per share of $13.25.

May 17, 2017 1:26 PM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,200 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  AOSL, AVD, BCC, BGSF, CDR, CTRE, DV, LUK, PHX, PRLB, RTIX, SFM, STAY, TRP, WAGE, ZAGG
    
Downgrades:  ABCO, ACIW, AMAG, CQP, HDNG, INT, NEWM, RGS, SGEN, SSP, TAC
    
Initiations:  None
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

May 8, 2017 11:00 AM EDT









New Media Announces Solid First Quarter 2017 Results And Dividend Of $0.35 Per Common Share
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM) today reported its financial results for the first quarter ended March 26, 2017.

Apr 27, 2017 6:50 AM EDT









New Media Schedules First Quarter Results And Dividend Announcement
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE: NEWM) announced today that it will release its first quarter financial results and dividend for the first quarter on Thursday, April 27, 2017, prior to...

Apr 5, 2017 4:15 PM EDT









Short Interest Jumps 10.7% For NEWM
The most recent short interest data has been released for the 03/15/2017 settlement date, which shows a 255,666 share increase in total short interest for New Media Investment Group Inc , to 2,638,587, an increase of 10.73% since 02/28/2017. Total short interest is just one way to look at short data; another metric that we here at Dividend Channel find particularly useful is the "days to cover" metric because it considers both the total shares short and the average daily volume of shares traded.

Mar 27, 2017 3:03 PM EDT









RSI Alert: New Media Investment Group Now Oversold
The DividendRank formula at Dividend Channel ranks a coverage universe of thousands of dividend stocks, according to a proprietary formula designed to identify those stocks that combine two important characteristics — strong fundamentals and a valuation that looks inexpensive. New Media Investment Group Inc presently has a stellar rank, in the top 10% of the coverage universe, which suggests it is among the top most "interesting" ideas that merit further research by investors.

Mar 22, 2017 4:01 PM EDT









First Week Of May 19th Options Trading For New Media Investment Group (NEWM)
Investors in New Media Investment Group Inc saw new options begin trading this week, for the May 19th expiration. At Stock Options Channel, our YieldBoost formula has looked up and down the NEWM options chain for the new May 19th contracts and identified one put and one call contract of particular interest.

Mar 22, 2017 11:37 AM EDT









New Media Investment Group Named Top 25 Dividend Stock With 9.48% Yield (NEWM)
New Media Investment Group Inc has been named as a Top 25 dividend stock, according the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report. The report noted that among the coverage universe, NEWM shares displayed both attractive valuation metrics and strong profitability metrics.

Mar 7, 2017 7:28 AM EST









NEWM: Insiders vs. Shorts
The most recent short interest data was recently released for the 01/31/2017 settlement date, and New Media Investment Group Inc is one of the most shorted stocks of the Russell 3000, based on 7.83 "days to cover" versus the median component at 5.13. There are a number of ways to look at short data, but one metric that we find particularly useful is the "days to cover" because it considers both the total shares short and the average daily volume of shares typically traded.

Feb 27, 2017 2:36 PM EST









Ratings Changes Today
TheStreet Quant Ratings provides fair and objective information to help you make educated investing decisions.  We rate over 4,200 stocks daily and provide 5-page PDF reports for each stock.  These ratings can change daily and today's changes are reflected in the email below.  

If you are looking to check-up on the stocks you currently own or are looking for new ideas, you can find our full database of password-protected ratings reports in our proprietary ratings screener:  
http://www.thestreet.com/k/qr/flat/stock-screener.html    
    
Upgrades:  ABMD, ABX, AEM, BGG, BIIB, HBM, HTBI, KALU, MNTA, NEWM, NQ, SNE, VMI, VPG, WMT, XCRA
    
Downgrades:  CGNX, DAKT, EXAC, FSLR, HOLI, PFLT
    
Initiations:  AGR
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Feb 22, 2017 11:00 AM EST









New Media Announces Solid Fourth Quarter & Full Year 2016 Results And Dividend Of $0.35 Per Common Share
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM) today reported its financial results for the fourth quarter and full year ended December 25, 2016.

Feb 21, 2017 6:50 AM EST









New Media Investment Group Named Top Dividend Stock With Insider Buying and 8.90% Yield (NEWM)
In this series, we look through the most recent Dividend Channel ''DividendRank'' report, and then we cherry pick only those companies that have experienced insider buying within the past six months. The officers and directors of a company tend to have a unique insider's view of the business, and presumably the only reason an insider would choose to take their hard-earned cash and use it to buy stock in the open market, is that they expect to make money — maybe they find the stock very undervalued, or maybe they see exciting progress within the company, or maybe both.

Feb 14, 2017 2:31 PM EST









New Media Schedules Fourth Quarter & Full Year 2016 Results And Dividend Announcement
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM) announced today that it will release its fourth quarter and full year 2016 financial results and dividend for the fourth quarter on Tuesday, February...

Feb 1, 2017 4:16 PM EST









New Media Completes The Acquisition Of The Ohio Publishing Division Of Wooster Republican Printing Company For $21.2 Million And Announces The Sale Of The Medford, Oregon Mail Tribune For $15.0 Million
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM), one of the largest publishers of locally based print and online media in the United States as measured by number of publications, announced today...

Jan 31, 2017 4:48 PM EST









New Media Investment Group is Oversold
The DividendRank formula at Dividend Channel ranks a coverage universe of thousands of dividend stocks, according to a proprietary formula designed to identify those stocks that combine two important characteristics — strong fundamentals and a valuation that looks inexpensive. New Media Investment Group Inc presently has a stellar rank, in the top 10% of the coverage universe, which suggests it is among the top most "interesting" ideas that merit further research by investors.

Jan 30, 2017 11:33 AM EST













Content Partners' $400 Million Deal to Buy Revolution Studios Shows Even Old Content Can Sell
Revolution hasn't made a film in 10 years but still commands a steep price for its 126 movies and 240 TV shows.

Jan 5, 2017 10:54 AM EST













First Week of February 2017 Options Trading For New Media Investment Group (NEWM)
Investors in New Media Investment Group Inc saw new options become available this week, for the February 2017 expiration. At Stock Options Channel, our YieldBoost formula has looked up and down the NEWM options chain for the new February 2017 contracts and identified one put and one call contract of particular interest.

Dec 21, 2016 10:35 AM EST













3 Companies With Significant Insider Buying
Corporate leaders engaged in insider buying usually have a longer time horizon than individual investors.

Dec 20, 2016 2:00 PM EST













New Media Completes The Acquisition Of Harris Enterprises For $20.4 Million
New Media Investment Group Inc. ("New Media" or the "Company", NYSE:NEWM), one of the largest publishers of locally based print and online media in the United States as measured by number of publications, announced today...

Nov 30, 2016 4:15 PM EST













July 2017 Options Now Available For New Media Investment Group (NEWM)
Investors in New Media Investment Group Inc saw new options begin trading today, for the July 2017 expiration. One of the key inputs that goes into the price an option buyer is willing to pay, is the time value, so with 242 days until expiration the newly trading contracts represent a potential opportunity for sellers of puts or calls to achieve a higher premium than would be available for the contracts with a closer expiration.

Nov 21, 2016 12:13 PM EST



















Next






Load More









Quant Rating on 4:03 PM EDT 7/26/2017


C
(Hold)






Get the (NEWM) Report Here 







From Our Partners



Notable earnings before Thursday’s open

SeekingAlpha



Will Wonder Woman Rescue The Russell 3000 Dividend Dog Net Gain Ace?

SeekingAlpha



Top 50 Russell 2000 Small Caps Sport 7% To 17% Yield For July

SeekingAlpha



Follower Favorite Top Dogs Spot An Industrial For Gains Plus A REIT ETF For Yield In July

SeekingAlpha



New Media rebrands SMB unit as UpCurve

SeekingAlpha



Publishing Industry Stock Outlook - June 2017

Zacks



New Media acquire assets from Calkins Media

SeekingAlpha



Dividend Dog Followers Get More Ways To Put Their Favorite Underdogs In Print

SeekingAlpha



PRO Weekly Digest: Unconventional Investing With Dan Stringer

SeekingAlpha



A Cautionary Note On The New York Times: Apres Le Trump Bump, Le Deluge

SeekingAlpha



New media announces authorization of share repurchase program

SeekingAlpha



Consumer Cyclical Dogs Pulled By Stein Mart, Tailored Brands, And National CineMedia May Gains

SeekingAlpha



New Media's Decline Is Accelerating, Not Slowing

SeekingAlpha



New Media upgraded to Overweight from Equal Weight at Stephens

The Fly



Top S&P SmallCap 600 Dividend Dogs Overweight Real Estate Sector In April

SeekingAlpha



























TheStreet
Quant Rating:

C (Hold)



Get the (NEWM) Report Here 













 











Trending


FTC Seen as Set to Block Rite Aid Deal


Tesla Headlines This Lineup of 12 Amazing New Cars for 2018


Honda Accord Through the Years: 20 Reasons the 2018 Model Is a Really Big Deal


Apple's iPhone 8 Is Coming, and It Could Be in Your Hands Very Soon


It Would Be 'Crazy' to Clean House at Wells Fargo, CEO Says











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 












Stockflare
  NEWM:New York Stock Quote - New Media Investment Group Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  New Media Investment Group Inc   NEWM:US   New York        13.35USD   0.36   2.63%     As of 8:04 PM EDT 7/26/2017     Open   13.72    Day Range   13.35 - 13.82    Volume   556,283    Previous Close   13.71    52Wk Range   11.87 - 19.89    1 Yr Return   -25.36%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   13.72    Day Range   13.35 - 13.82    Volume   556,283    Previous Close   13.71    52Wk Range   11.87 - 19.89    1 Yr Return   -25.36%    YTD Return   -16.51%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   17.76    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   0.75    Market Cap (m USD)   715.746    Shares Outstanding  (m)   53.614    Price/Sales (TTM)   0.50    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   10.29%        Sector Consumer Discretionary   % Price Change -0.02%     Industry Media   % Price Change +0.13%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases    8/24/2016   New Media Investment Group (NEWM) Stock Closed Lower on Citi Downgrade  - The Street    There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     7/10/2017   Denise Robbins Named SVP, Consumer Marketing for GateHouse Media     7/6/2017   New Media Schedules Second Quarter Results and Dividend Announcement     7/3/2017   BridgeTower Media Acquires SC Biz News     6/26/2017   New Media Announces Rebranding of Propel Business Services, Changes Name to UpCurve     6/19/2017   New Media Announces Agreement to Acquire Calkins Media Incorporated for $17.5 Million     6/1/2017   GateHouse Media Launches New Brand Campaign “Newsroom Hero”     5/26/2017   Propel Marketing Wins Local Media Association’s Best Digital Agency Award     5/17/2017   New Media Announces Authorization of Share Repurchase Program     5/8/2017   Fortress Reports First Quarter 2017 Results and Announces Dividend of $0.09 per Share     4/27/2017   New Media Announces Solid First Quarter 2017 Results and Dividend of $0.35 per Common Share    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   New Media Investment Group, Inc. operates as an online advertising and digital marketing company. The Company provides advertising services in local newspapers/shoppers/yellow pages. New Media Investment Group serves customers in the United Stated.    Address  1345 Avenue of the Americas45th FloorNew York, NY 10105United States   Phone  1-212-479-3160   Website   www.newmediainv.com     Executives Board Members    Michael E Reed "Mike"  President/CEO    Gregory W Freiberg  CFO/Chief Acctg Officer      Kirk A Davis   Chief Operating Officer    Ashley Higgins  Investor Relations    Cameron D Macdougall  Secretary     Show More         


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














new media investment group inc - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










NEWM Stock Predictions | flashratings.com



Ad
 ·
flashratings.com



All Current Analyst Ratings and Price Targets for NEWM





About us



FlashRatings' Principles




Analyst Ranking



Privacy





Canadian Weed Stocks Soar | moneymorning.com



Ad
 ·
moneymorning.com/​marijuana-stocks



Forget Energy, Metals and Tech; This Investment is Making Millionaires!





Get Rich From Legal Weed



America's Next Gold Rush



The Legal Weed Stock Rocket




Weed Stocks Set to Soar



A Once-in-a-Lifetime Opportunity



How Canada Could Make You Millions





U.S. Trust Investment Services - Get Expert Advice Now



Ad
 ·
www.ustrust.com/​Investment/​Management



Our Professionals Have Valuable Expertise In A Broad Spectrum Financial Assets.





Articles By U.S. Trust



Finance & Liquidity



Wealth Structuring





Searches related tonew media investment group inc



new media investment group publications


new media investment group 10k


new media investment group wikipedia


new media investment corp



new media investments inc


new media investment group newspapers


gatehouse media stock price


new media newspaper group




Web Results

New Media Investment Group

www.newmediainv.com


Contact Us. New Media 1345 Avenue of the Americas 45th Floor New York, NY 10105 212.479.3160 ir@newmediainv.com



About Us



Contact Us



New Media Investment Group Inc. - MarketWatch

www.marketwatch.com/investing/stock/NEWM/news


Updated news for New Media Investment Group Inc. - including NEWM company news, press releases and other industry & stock market news.


New Media Investment Group Inc. - MarketWatch

www.marketwatch.com/investing/stock/NEWM


New Media Investment Group Inc. stock price, stock quotes and financial overviews from MarketWatch.


New Media Investment Group Inc. - Zacks Investment Research

https://www.zacks.com/stock/quote/NEWM


View New Media Investment Group Inc. NEWM investment & stock information. Get the latest New Media Investment Group Inc. NEWM detailed stock quotes, stock data, Real ...


New Media Investment Group Inc.: Private Company ...

https://www.bloomberg.com/research/stocks/private/snapshot.asp?...


New Media Investment Group Inc. company research & investing information. Find executives and the latest company news.


New Media Investment Group Inc - TheStreet.com

https://www.thestreet.com/quote/NEWM.html


View detailed financial information, real-time news, videos, quotes and analysis on New Media Investment Group Inc (NYSE:NEWM). Explore commentary on New Media ...


Profile: New Media Investment Group Inc (NEWM.N) - Reuters

www.reuters.com/finance/stocks/companyProfile?symbol=NEWM.N


New Media Investment Group Inc., incorporated on June 18, 2013, is a holding company. The Company owns, operates and invests in local media assets.


GateHouse Media - Wikipedia

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New_Media_Investment_Group


The terms involved the cancellation of shares of Gatehouse but those owners receiving warrants to buy shares in New Media Investment Group Inc., a new holding company.


New Media Investment Group Inc. (NEWM) - Yahoo Finance

https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/NEWM


View the basic NEWM stock chart on Yahoo Finance. Change the date range, chart type and compare New Media Investment Group Inc. against other companies.










NEWM Stock Predictions | flashratings.com



Ad
 ·
flashratings.com



All Current Analyst Ratings and Price Targets for NEWM





About us



FlashRatings' Principles




Analyst Ranking



Privacy





Canadian Weed Stocks Soar | moneymorning.com



Ad
 ·
moneymorning.com/​marijuana-stocks



Forget Energy, Metals and Tech; This Investment is Making Millionaires!





Get Rich From Legal Weed



America's Next Gold Rush



The Legal Weed Stock Rocket




Weed Stocks Set to Soar



A Once-in-a-Lifetime Opportunity



How Canada Could Make You Millions





U.S. Trust Investment Services - Get Expert Advice Now



Ad
 ·
www.ustrust.com/​Investment/​Management



Our Professionals Have Valuable Expertise In A Broad Spectrum Financial Assets.





Articles By U.S. Trust



Finance & Liquidity



Wealth Structuring




Searches related tonew media investment group inc



new media investment group publications


new media investment group 10k


new media investment group wikipedia


new media investment corp



new media investments inc


new media investment group newspapers


gatehouse media stock price


new media newspaper group




12345Next






Answers







GateHouse Media



reemerged from the preplanned bankruptcy in November 2013. In the restructured plan Gatehouse stock was cancelled and a new holding company for the...

more






Companies listed on the New York Stock...



US New America High Income Fund, Inc. (The) US The New Germany Fund, Inc. US The New Home Company Inc. US The New Ireland Fund, Inc.

more






Kinston Free Press



New Media Investment Group Inc. In 2015, Halifax was acquired by New Media Investment Group. It was a broadsheet-format

more




















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network




















Advice, Products and Services - Wealth Management | Raymond James








































Find an Advisor
Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.




Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






What Are You Planning For?

Growing My Wealth
Preserving My Wealth
Planning for Retirement
Providing for Family
Managing My Estate
Growing My Business



Advice, Products & Services

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Investment Solutions
Financial & Retirement Planning
Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Banking & Lending Services
Insurance Solutions
Institutional Services
Private Wealth Services



Why a Raymond James Advisor

Who Our Advisors Serve
Working with a Raymond James Advisor
About Raymond James
Client Resources



Market Commentary & Insights

Economic Commentary
Investment Strategy
Bond Market Commentary & Analysis





Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management









Raymond James Accolades
The strength of Raymond James is reflected in both these ongoing accomplishments and in the consistent recognition we receive from our industry and our peers.
Grow With Us





Investment Banking

Industries of Focus
Capabilities & Coverage Areas
Transaction History
News & Insights
Leadership Team



Public Finance

Specialty Areas
Capabilities
Locations
Industry Insight
News



Equity Capital Markets

Equity Research
Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Corporate Access
Corporate & Executive Services
Equity-Linked Securities
Conferences & Events



Fixed Income Capital Markets

eFolio®
Institutional Sales
Trading
Research & Strategies



Depository Institution Services

Fixed Income Capital Markets
Investment Banking
Equity Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Equity Research
Wealth Management & Trust
Tax Credit Funds
Raymond James Bank



Additional Institutional Services

Eagle Asset Management
Institutional Consulting Services
Merchant Banking
Raymond James Bank
Tax Credit Funds
Wealth Management Services for Depositories





Corporations & Institutions
Together we take a strategic approach to capital markets, backed by the strength of full-service offerings and broad and deep industry expertise.
Explore Corporations & Institutions









Contact an AdvisorChoice® Consultant
 Have a confidential conversation with our recruiters about what your business would look like as an advisor at Raymond James.
Ready To Learn More?





Partner with Us


Affiliation Options

Traditional Employee
Alex. Brown
Independent Employee
Independent Advisor
Independent RIA
Bank & Credit Union Advisors
Custody & Clearing
New Advisors
Hybrid RIA



Resources & Support

Technology
Products
Services
Diversity & Networks



Practice Insights


In the News

Press Releases



Contact Us

Talk to a Recruiter
Join Raymond James





Advisor Opportunities
Our advisors are viewed as clients of the firm, which means we provide world-class resources and support to help run their business on their terms.
Explore Advisor Opportunities









About Raymond James
No matter the business, we believe if we do what’s right for clients, we’ll help them achieve success while also realizing our own. It’s that simple.
Learn More





About Us

Values, Mission & Pledge
Company History
Leadership Team
Social Responsibility
Accolades
Subsidiaries
Art Collection
Raymond James Stadium®
By the Numbers



Careers

Why Raymond James
Advisor Opportunities
Experienced Professionals
Students & Recent Grads
Diversity & Inclusion
Getting Hired
Department Descriptions
All Access - Careers Blog



Investors

Calendar of Events
Financial Reports
Earnings
RJF Stock Information
Analysts Covering RJF
Corporate Governance
Shareholders' Meeting
Presentations & Webcasts



News & Media

Press Releases
Media Kit
TV & Radio Capabilities
Financial Highlights
Investment & Economic Experts



Contact Us

Map & Directions
Client Assistance with Investor Access
Shareholders' and Other Interested Parties for Our Board of Directors
All Other Inquiries





Careers at Raymond James
Our associates are more than the heart and soul of our firm – they’re the key to its continued success.
Take Your Next Step











Investor Access
Discover the ease and convenience of having online access to your Raymond James accounts.

Contact Us / FAQ 
Privacy / Security
Client Resources



Broad Scope, Deep Coverage 
Raymond James’ equity research is a cornerstone of the organization.  Raymond James and its affiliates in Canada and Europe employ more than 70 research analysts who cover nearly 1,300 companies in nine highly focused industries.


eFolio®
The only truly interactive portfolio management system for financial institutions, eFolio allows you to interact with your portfolio online -- sorting, strategies, inventories, research, swaps and more.


Commission Management



Client Login

Questions?
Call us:
24 x 7 global phone support


Email us:
support@intralinks.com







Investor Access
Equity Research
eFolio
Commission Management
Tax Credit Funds





Enter Your Login ID



Enter Your Password




Enroll In Investor Access 


Remember Login ID




Forgot 
Login ID						or 
						 
Password? 
|

Login Help



 Login
Login
Login
Login












Enter Search Terms












Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management 





Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor




















Wealth Management
Advice, Products & Services






Wealth Management

What Are You Planning For?


Growing My Wealth




Preserving My Wealth




Planning for Retirement




Providing for Family




Managing My Estate




Growing My Business






Advice, Products & Services


Working with a Raymond James Advisor




Investment Solutions


Asset Management Services


How We're Different




Managed Accounts


What's a Managed Account?




Separately Managed Accounts






The Role of Your Advisor




Freedom


How We're Different




The Freedom ETF Account




The Freedom Mutual Fund Account




The Freedom Retirement Account




The Freedom UMA Account






Raymond James Consulting Services


How We're Different




Four Step Process






Passport


How We're Different




What Else You Should Know About Fee-Based Accounts








Fixed Income


Fixed Income Advantage


Bond Portfolio Evaluation & Reporting






Fixed Income Strategies


Cost of Waiting




Estate Planning with Bonds




Laddering Maturities




Premium Bonds




Bond Swaps




Bonds vs. Bond Funds




A Guide to Understanding Floating-Rate Securities






Bond Basics


Duration & Convexity




Callable Bonds


Make-Whole Calls






Types of Income


Step-Ups








Municipal Bonds


Important Resources for Municipal Bond Investors




Current Municipal Bond Market Considerations


A Primer on the Sale Process




Pension Obligation Funding Overview






Municipal Bond Risks: Lack of Disclosure May Affect Liquidity




Investing in New Issue Bonds




New Issue Calendar




Build America Bonds






Taxable Bonds


U.S. Treasury Securities




TIPS - Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities




Government-Sponsored Enterprise Debt Securities




Brokered Certificates of Deposits (CDs)




Corporate Bonds




Foreign Currency Bonds




Preferred Securities




MBS and CMOs






Fixed Income Offering Disclosure Documentation Information


Syndicate Official Statements




Preliminary Offering Documents




Final Offering Documents






Pricing Factors


Bond Prices and Valuations




Risks of Bond Investing








Research Areas


Equity Research


Research Team




Individual Company Research Reports




Specialty Reports




How to Read Our Equity Research Reports




Analysts’ Best Picks® Record






International Research




Mutual Fund Research


Mutual Fund Company Reports






Closed-End Fund Research




Asset Management Research






Mutual Funds




Closed-End Funds




Unit Investment Trusts




Convertible Securities




Options




Restricted Securities






Financial & Retirement Planning


Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs)


IRA Alternatives




The Simple IRA




Understanding Required Minimum Distributions






Retirement Planning Calculator




Owners-Only 401(k)




Qualified Retirement Plans




Simplified Employee Pension Plans




College Planning




Retirement Plan Advisory Council


About Us


The RPAC Advantage




What to Expect






Our Services




Standard of Care


Mission Statement






Advisor Locator








Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services


Raymond James Trust


Solutions & Services




Questions About Trusts




Working with Attorneys & COIs




Raymond James Charitable








Banking & Lending Services


Raymond James Bank




Cash Management


Capital Access




Cash Sweeps


Raymond James Bank Deposit Program




Raymond James Bank Deposit Program - Affiliated Banks


Participating Banks






Raymond James Trust Sweep Program




Client Interest Program




JPMorgan Money Market Funds




Raymond James Bank with Check Writing




Raymond James International Bank Deposit Program (non-FDIC)






Raymond James Debit Card




Raymond James Credit Card






Margin


Margin Disclosure Statement








Insurance Solutions


Selecting the Right Life Insurance




Long-Term Care Protection




Variable Annuities and Your Retirement




Raymond James Insurance Group






Institutional Services




Private Wealth Services






Why a Raymond James Advisor


Who Our Advisors Serve




Working with a Raymond James Advisor


How to Choose a Financial Advisor






About Raymond James




Client Resources


Cost Basis Reporting




Tax Reporting


H&R Block® Users




TaxAct® Users




TurboTax® Users




Tax Info (Export to Excel)






A Guide to Your Statement


A Guide To Your Raymond James Trade Confirmation






Investor Access Tour


Investor Access Tutorial




Investor Access Mobile






Your Rights & Responsibilities




Client Account Fees & Charges




Market Numbers


Stock & Equity Quote Look-Up




Deposit Rates




Lending Rates






eSignature Resources




Glossary of Terms








Market Commentary & Insights


Economic Commentary


Monthly Economic Outlook




Monthly Economic Calendar






Investment Strategy




Bond Market Commentary & Analysis


Weekly Bond Market Commentary




Fixed Income Market Commentary
















Wealth Management Advice, Products & Services


Sophisticated solutions for a complex world.


Through your Raymond James advisor, you have access to the world-class products and services needed to address even the most complex financial needs. And objective, unbiased advice means recommendations are always in your best interests.

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Your advisor is there for you, your goals, your family and your future. So whatever you are planning for, he or she will be at your side every step of the way to help you navigate a path to the future you envision.
Learn More

Investment Solutions
Your advisor is free to make unbiased recommendations from a broad range of investment products backed by industry-leading research and due diligence. Because choice plays a critical role in planning, both in terms of diversification and as strategies change along with your lifestyle and needs.
Learn More

Financial Retirement & Planning
The best-laid plans are built together, based on your goals, in deep collaboration with your advisor, with a long-term focus on your future. And they are continually monitored and adjusted over time, along with changes in your life and markets.
Learn More

Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Through Raymond James Trust, your advisor can draw from an array of tax, trust and estate planning resources and expertise. So you can create a lasting legacy by passing down not just assets, but the values you hold close.
Learn More

Banking & Lending Services
A complete plan looks at both sides of the ledger. Through Raymond James Bank your advisor has access to a complete suite of banking and lending services to help address all aspects of your financial life.
Learn More

Insurance Solutions
Protecting yourself from the unexpected plays a crucial role in a complete financial plan. We offer a wide array of insurance solutions to help offer reassurance for you, your family and your business.
Learn More

Institutional Services
Our full-service investment banking capabilities provide the deep industry expertise and experience to help take your business to the next level.
Learn More

Private Wealth Services
Raymond James offers a variety of services specifically tailored to the needs of our advisors’ most uniquely successful clients.
Learn More
 

























Commentary & Insights




                                    Lifestyle
                                             &vert; 
July 11, 2017                                
Should you consider a pet trust?
The name may evoke stories of heirs and heiresses setting aside enormous sums for their pets, but these trusts aren’t just for millionaires.
Read More





                                    Goal Planning
                                             &vert; 
June 27, 2017                                
Set new goals in summer
With several financial deadlines behind you, take time this summer to review your progress, set new goals and tie up loose ends. 
Read More





                                    Retirement
                                             &vert; 
July 7, 2017                                
Are you ready for an encore career?
More and more Americans are going back to work or volunteering after retirement. 
Read More



View All














Find an Advisor


Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.



Enter City, ST or Zip Code






Enter Last Name










 



















Find An Advisor | Raymond James








































Find an Advisor
Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.




Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






What Are You Planning For?

Growing My Wealth
Preserving My Wealth
Planning for Retirement
Providing for Family
Managing My Estate
Growing My Business



Advice, Products & Services

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Investment Solutions
Financial & Retirement Planning
Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Banking & Lending Services
Insurance Solutions
Institutional Services
Private Wealth Services



Why a Raymond James Advisor

Who Our Advisors Serve
Working with a Raymond James Advisor
About Raymond James
Client Resources



Market Commentary & Insights

Economic Commentary
Investment Strategy
Bond Market Commentary & Analysis





Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management









Raymond James Accolades
The strength of Raymond James is reflected in both these ongoing accomplishments and in the consistent recognition we receive from our industry and our peers.
Grow With Us





Investment Banking

Industries of Focus
Capabilities & Coverage Areas
Transaction History
News & Insights
Leadership Team



Public Finance

Specialty Areas
Capabilities
Locations
Industry Insight
News



Equity Capital Markets

Equity Research
Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Corporate Access
Corporate & Executive Services
Equity-Linked Securities
Conferences & Events



Fixed Income Capital Markets

eFolio®
Institutional Sales
Trading
Research & Strategies



Depository Institution Services

Fixed Income Capital Markets
Investment Banking
Equity Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Equity Research
Wealth Management & Trust
Tax Credit Funds
Raymond James Bank



Additional Institutional Services

Eagle Asset Management
Institutional Consulting Services
Merchant Banking
Raymond James Bank
Tax Credit Funds
Wealth Management Services for Depositories





Corporations & Institutions
Together we take a strategic approach to capital markets, backed by the strength of full-service offerings and broad and deep industry expertise.
Explore Corporations & Institutions









Contact an AdvisorChoice® Consultant
 Have a confidential conversation with our recruiters about what your business would look like as an advisor at Raymond James.
Ready To Learn More?





Partner with Us


Affiliation Options

Traditional Employee
Alex. Brown
Independent Employee
Independent Advisor
Independent RIA
Bank & Credit Union Advisors
Custody & Clearing
New Advisors
Hybrid RIA



Resources & Support

Technology
Products
Services
Diversity & Networks



Practice Insights


In the News

Press Releases



Contact Us

Talk to a Recruiter
Join Raymond James





Advisor Opportunities
Our advisors are viewed as clients of the firm, which means we provide world-class resources and support to help run their business on their terms.
Explore Advisor Opportunities









About Raymond James
No matter the business, we believe if we do what’s right for clients, we’ll help them achieve success while also realizing our own. It’s that simple.
Learn More





About Us

Values, Mission & Pledge
Company History
Leadership Team
Social Responsibility
Accolades
Subsidiaries
Art Collection
Raymond James Stadium®
By the Numbers



Careers

Why Raymond James
Advisor Opportunities
Experienced Professionals
Students & Recent Grads
Diversity & Inclusion
Getting Hired
Department Descriptions
All Access - Careers Blog



Investors

Calendar of Events
Financial Reports
Earnings
RJF Stock Information
Analysts Covering RJF
Corporate Governance
Shareholders' Meeting
Presentations & Webcasts



News & Media

Press Releases
Media Kit
TV & Radio Capabilities
Financial Highlights
Investment & Economic Experts



Contact Us

Map & Directions
Client Assistance with Investor Access
Shareholders' and Other Interested Parties for Our Board of Directors
All Other Inquiries





Careers at Raymond James
Our associates are more than the heart and soul of our firm – they’re the key to its continued success.
Take Your Next Step











Investor Access
Discover the ease and convenience of having online access to your Raymond James accounts.

Contact Us / FAQ 
Privacy / Security
Client Resources



Broad Scope, Deep Coverage 
Raymond James’ equity research is a cornerstone of the organization.  Raymond James and its affiliates in Canada and Europe employ more than 70 research analysts who cover nearly 1,300 companies in nine highly focused industries.


eFolio®
The only truly interactive portfolio management system for financial institutions, eFolio allows you to interact with your portfolio online -- sorting, strategies, inventories, research, swaps and more.


Commission Management



Client Login

Questions?
Call us:
24 x 7 global phone support


Email us:
support@intralinks.com







Investor Access
Equity Research
eFolio
Commission Management
Tax Credit Funds





Enter Your Login ID



Enter Your Password




Enroll In Investor Access 


Remember Login ID




Forgot 
Login ID						or 
						 
Password? 
|

Login Help



 Login
Login
Login
Login












Enter Search Terms












Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management 





Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor















Find an Advisor 






Search by Location 
Search by Advisor Last Name








Enter City, ST or Zip Code 
Please enter a valid location




Within 25 miles
Within 50 miles
Within 75 miles
Within 100 miles



Find An Advisor










Enter Advisor Last Name 
Please enter a valid last name



Find An Advisor























Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards Inc. owns the certification marks CFP®, CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ and federally registered CFP (with flame design) in the U.S., which it awards to individuals who successfully complete CFP Board's initial and ongoing certification requirements.


Investment Management Consultants Association is the owner of the certification mark "CIMA®," the service marks "Certified Investment Management AnalystSM," "Investment Management Consultants AssocationSM," and "IMCA®." Use of CIMA® or Certified Investment Management AnalystSM signifies that the user has successfully completed IMCA's initial and ongoing credentialing requirements for investment management consultants.


Investment Management Consultants Assocation ® (IMCA ®) is the owner of the certification marks "CPWA ®" and "Certified Private Wealth Advisor ®". Use of the CPWA ® or Certified Private Wealth Advisor ® signifies that the user has successfully completed IMCA's initial and ongoing credentialing requirements for wealth advisors.





 



















Find An Advisor | Raymond James








































Find an Advisor
Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.




Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






What Are You Planning For?

Growing My Wealth
Preserving My Wealth
Planning for Retirement
Providing for Family
Managing My Estate
Growing My Business



Advice, Products & Services

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Investment Solutions
Financial & Retirement Planning
Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Banking & Lending Services
Insurance Solutions
Institutional Services
Private Wealth Services



Why a Raymond James Advisor

Who Our Advisors Serve
Working with a Raymond James Advisor
About Raymond James
Client Resources



Market Commentary & Insights

Economic Commentary
Investment Strategy
Bond Market Commentary & Analysis





Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management









Raymond James Accolades
The strength of Raymond James is reflected in both these ongoing accomplishments and in the consistent recognition we receive from our industry and our peers.
Grow With Us





Investment Banking

Industries of Focus
Capabilities & Coverage Areas
Transaction History
News & Insights
Leadership Team



Public Finance

Specialty Areas
Capabilities
Locations
Industry Insight
News



Equity Capital Markets

Equity Research
Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Corporate Access
Corporate & Executive Services
Equity-Linked Securities
Conferences & Events



Fixed Income Capital Markets

eFolio®
Institutional Sales
Trading
Research & Strategies



Depository Institution Services

Fixed Income Capital Markets
Investment Banking
Equity Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Equity Research
Wealth Management & Trust
Tax Credit Funds
Raymond James Bank



Additional Institutional Services

Eagle Asset Management
Institutional Consulting Services
Merchant Banking
Raymond James Bank
Tax Credit Funds
Wealth Management Services for Depositories





Corporations & Institutions
Together we take a strategic approach to capital markets, backed by the strength of full-service offerings and broad and deep industry expertise.
Explore Corporations & Institutions









Contact an AdvisorChoice® Consultant
 Have a confidential conversation with our recruiters about what your business would look like as an advisor at Raymond James.
Ready To Learn More?





Partner with Us


Affiliation Options

Traditional Employee
Alex. Brown
Independent Employee
Independent Advisor
Independent RIA
Bank & Credit Union Advisors
Custody & Clearing
New Advisors
Hybrid RIA



Resources & Support

Technology
Products
Services
Diversity & Networks



Practice Insights


In the News

Press Releases



Contact Us

Talk to a Recruiter
Join Raymond James





Advisor Opportunities
Our advisors are viewed as clients of the firm, which means we provide world-class resources and support to help run their business on their terms.
Explore Advisor Opportunities









About Raymond James
No matter the business, we believe if we do what’s right for clients, we’ll help them achieve success while also realizing our own. It’s that simple.
Learn More





About Us

Values, Mission & Pledge
Company History
Leadership Team
Social Responsibility
Accolades
Subsidiaries
Art Collection
Raymond James Stadium®
By the Numbers



Careers

Why Raymond James
Advisor Opportunities
Experienced Professionals
Students & Recent Grads
Diversity & Inclusion
Getting Hired
Department Descriptions
All Access - Careers Blog



Investors

Calendar of Events
Financial Reports
Earnings
RJF Stock Information
Analysts Covering RJF
Corporate Governance
Shareholders' Meeting
Presentations & Webcasts



News & Media

Press Releases
Media Kit
TV & Radio Capabilities
Financial Highlights
Investment & Economic Experts



Contact Us

Map & Directions
Client Assistance with Investor Access
Shareholders' and Other Interested Parties for Our Board of Directors
All Other Inquiries





Careers at Raymond James
Our associates are more than the heart and soul of our firm – they’re the key to its continued success.
Take Your Next Step











Investor Access
Discover the ease and convenience of having online access to your Raymond James accounts.

Contact Us / FAQ 
Privacy / Security
Client Resources



Broad Scope, Deep Coverage 
Raymond James’ equity research is a cornerstone of the organization.  Raymond James and its affiliates in Canada and Europe employ more than 70 research analysts who cover nearly 1,300 companies in nine highly focused industries.


eFolio®
The only truly interactive portfolio management system for financial institutions, eFolio allows you to interact with your portfolio online -- sorting, strategies, inventories, research, swaps and more.


Commission Management



Client Login

Questions?
Call us:
24 x 7 global phone support


Email us:
support@intralinks.com







Investor Access
Equity Research
eFolio
Commission Management
Tax Credit Funds





Enter Your Login ID



Enter Your Password




Enroll In Investor Access 


Remember Login ID




Forgot 
Login ID						or 
						 
Password? 
|

Login Help



 Login
Login
Login
Login












Enter Search Terms












Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management 





Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor















Find an Advisor 






Search by Location 
Search by Advisor Last Name








Enter City, ST or Zip Code 
Please enter a valid location




Within 25 miles
Within 50 miles
Within 75 miles
Within 100 miles



Find An Advisor










Enter Advisor Last Name 
Please enter a valid last name



Find An Advisor























Certified Financial Planner Board of Standards Inc. owns the certification marks CFP®, CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ and federally registered CFP (with flame design) in the U.S., which it awards to individuals who successfully complete CFP Board's initial and ongoing certification requirements.


Investment Management Consultants Association is the owner of the certification mark "CIMA®," the service marks "Certified Investment Management AnalystSM," "Investment Management Consultants AssocationSM," and "IMCA®." Use of CIMA® or Certified Investment Management AnalystSM signifies that the user has successfully completed IMCA's initial and ongoing credentialing requirements for investment management consultants.


Investment Management Consultants Assocation ® (IMCA ®) is the owner of the certification marks "CPWA ®" and "Certified Private Wealth Advisor ®". Use of the CPWA ® or Certified Private Wealth Advisor ® signifies that the user has successfully completed IMCA's initial and ongoing credentialing requirements for wealth advisors.





 



















What Are You Planning For - Wealth Management | Raymond James








































Find an Advisor
Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.




Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






What Are You Planning For?

Growing My Wealth
Preserving My Wealth
Planning for Retirement
Providing for Family
Managing My Estate
Growing My Business



Advice, Products & Services

Working with a Raymond James Advisor
Investment Solutions
Financial & Retirement Planning
Estate, Charitable Giving & Trust Services
Banking & Lending Services
Insurance Solutions
Institutional Services
Private Wealth Services



Why a Raymond James Advisor

Who Our Advisors Serve
Working with a Raymond James Advisor
About Raymond James
Client Resources



Market Commentary & Insights

Economic Commentary
Investment Strategy
Bond Market Commentary & Analysis





Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management









Raymond James Accolades
The strength of Raymond James is reflected in both these ongoing accomplishments and in the consistent recognition we receive from our industry and our peers.
Grow With Us





Investment Banking

Industries of Focus
Capabilities & Coverage Areas
Transaction History
News & Insights
Leadership Team



Public Finance

Specialty Areas
Capabilities
Locations
Industry Insight
News



Equity Capital Markets

Equity Research
Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Corporate Access
Corporate & Executive Services
Equity-Linked Securities
Conferences & Events



Fixed Income Capital Markets

eFolio®
Institutional Sales
Trading
Research & Strategies



Depository Institution Services

Fixed Income Capital Markets
Investment Banking
Equity Sales, Trading & Syndicate
Equity Research
Wealth Management & Trust
Tax Credit Funds
Raymond James Bank



Additional Institutional Services

Eagle Asset Management
Institutional Consulting Services
Merchant Banking
Raymond James Bank
Tax Credit Funds
Wealth Management Services for Depositories





Corporations & Institutions
Together we take a strategic approach to capital markets, backed by the strength of full-service offerings and broad and deep industry expertise.
Explore Corporations & Institutions









Contact an AdvisorChoice® Consultant
 Have a confidential conversation with our recruiters about what your business would look like as an advisor at Raymond James.
Ready To Learn More?





Partner with Us


Affiliation Options

Traditional Employee
Alex. Brown
Independent Employee
Independent Advisor
Independent RIA
Bank & Credit Union Advisors
Custody & Clearing
New Advisors
Hybrid RIA



Resources & Support

Technology
Products
Services
Diversity & Networks



Practice Insights


In the News

Press Releases



Contact Us

Talk to a Recruiter
Join Raymond James





Advisor Opportunities
Our advisors are viewed as clients of the firm, which means we provide world-class resources and support to help run their business on their terms.
Explore Advisor Opportunities









About Raymond James
No matter the business, we believe if we do what’s right for clients, we’ll help them achieve success while also realizing our own. It’s that simple.
Learn More





About Us

Values, Mission & Pledge
Company History
Leadership Team
Social Responsibility
Accolades
Subsidiaries
Art Collection
Raymond James Stadium®
By the Numbers



Careers

Why Raymond James
Advisor Opportunities
Experienced Professionals
Students & Recent Grads
Diversity & Inclusion
Getting Hired
Department Descriptions
All Access - Careers Blog



Investors

Calendar of Events
Financial Reports
Earnings
RJF Stock Information
Analysts Covering RJF
Corporate Governance
Shareholders' Meeting
Presentations & Webcasts



News & Media

Press Releases
Media Kit
TV & Radio Capabilities
Financial Highlights
Investment & Economic Experts



Contact Us

Map & Directions
Client Assistance with Investor Access
Shareholders' and Other Interested Parties for Our Board of Directors
All Other Inquiries





Careers at Raymond James
Our associates are more than the heart and soul of our firm – they’re the key to its continued success.
Take Your Next Step











Investor Access
Discover the ease and convenience of having online access to your Raymond James accounts.

Contact Us / FAQ 
Privacy / Security
Client Resources



Broad Scope, Deep Coverage 
Raymond James’ equity research is a cornerstone of the organization.  Raymond James and its affiliates in Canada and Europe employ more than 70 research analysts who cover nearly 1,300 companies in nine highly focused industries.


eFolio®
The only truly interactive portfolio management system for financial institutions, eFolio allows you to interact with your portfolio online -- sorting, strategies, inventories, research, swaps and more.


Commission Management



Client Login

Questions?
Call us:
24 x 7 global phone support


Email us:
support@intralinks.com







Investor Access
Equity Research
eFolio
Commission Management
Tax Credit Funds





Enter Your Login ID



Enter Your Password




Enroll In Investor Access 


Remember Login ID




Forgot 
Login ID						or 
						 
Password? 
|

Login Help



 Login
Login
Login
Login












Enter Search Terms












Wealth Management
Your Raymond James advisor will help you prepare for life’s major financial milestones and every moment in between.
Explore Wealth Management 





Enter City, ST or Zip Code



Enter Last Name

Find An Advisor






















What Are You Planning For?




You have goals. 
We help you get there.

No two people have the exact same goals. That’s why it takes an individually tailored plan to make them a reality. Raymond James advisors work with many different clients at many different stages of life. So no matter where you are or where you’re trying to go, your advisor can create a customized plan to help you get there.







Growing My Wealth
Your advisor can help you build a portfolio that aligns with your goals, timeline and personal tolerance for risk.





Learn About Growing Your Wealth







 Preserving My Wealth
Our advisors have the resources and expertise to help build a plan for life’s “What ifs?”





Learn About Preserving Your Wealth







Planning for Retirement
It’s never been so important to have a plan designed to help ensure the lifestyle you want, now and well into the future.




Learn About Planning For Retirement







Providing for Family
Supporting a child’s education or caring for an aging loved one shouldn’t mean sacrificing your future.




Learn About Providing For Family







Managing My Estate
Proper legacy and estate planning is an important step toward ensuring your loved ones are cared for and your values are preserved.




Learn About Managing Your Estate







Growing My Business
Your advisor can provide access to capabilities and expertise to help with even the most complex planning needs.





Learn About Growing A Business















Commentary & Insights




                                    Lifestyle
                                             &vert; 
July 11, 2017                                
Should you consider a pet trust?
The name may evoke stories of heirs and heiresses setting aside enormous sums for their pets, but these trusts aren’t just for millionaires.
Read More





                                    Goal Planning
                                             &vert; 
June 27, 2017                                
Set new goals in summer
With several financial deadlines behind you, take time this summer to review your progress, set new goals and tie up loose ends. 
Read More





                                    Retirement
                                             &vert; 
July 7, 2017                                
Are you ready for an encore career?
More and more Americans are going back to work or volunteering after retirement. 
Read More



View All














Find an Advisor


Connect with a Raymond James advisor or office near you.



Enter City, ST or Zip Code






Enter Last Name












 










Free Inventor Kit | Lead Landing Page













































 


 










Research, Patent & Sell Your Invention Idea

PATENT YOUR INVENTION… BEFORE SOMEBODY ELSE DOES











 SEND MY FREE PATENT KIT









First Name


Last Name


Email



Phone Number





• Full Service Agency for Inventors
• Free Consultation. 100% Safe.
• Avoid Common Inventor Mistakes.









Grab Free Patent Kit & Discover:

New patent laws favor 1st inventor to file
No 2nd place prizes at the Patent Office
Holiday buying season is once a year


















From idea to 
retail stores
















How It Works
We start with the quickest and least expensive methods to help inventors save time and money.
1) Start by downloading our free eBook & Inventor Kit.
2) Get your invention idea reviewed for free.
3) Get started on your journey!
If you make a decision to use any of our services, you will be covered by our money back customer service promise. We can help you put your best foot forward and avoid costly mistakes.










WHAT IS YOUR BIG INVENTION IDEA?
Launch it with just a simple rough sketch






 Sketch
A simple rough sketch of your idea is all you need to get started with patent research & free consultation


 Patent
Getting patents ISSUED is the issue - instead of worthless filings  by non-licensed attorney/agents


 Sell
Bring your idea to life with a 3D prototype and introduce it to the world fast and easy
 











Real Patent Pros
All Provisional, Design & Utility Patent Applications handled in-house






Real Engineers
Fully engineered patent applications to exceed USPTO standards






Real Marketing Experts
Promote your invention to industry for sale or license for royalties





 







Scroll up

			Wordpress 		SEO
		 Plugin by 		SEOPressor




















How To Get Started | For Sale By Inventor
































































































 







 









Navigation



For Inventors

Inventor Resources
Professional Services

Provisional Patent
Utility Patent
Design Patent
Patent Drafting
Licensing
Research and Development
Engineering
Prototyping


Packages

Patent Search Packages
Patent Licensing Packages


Education

How To Get Started
Patent
Copyright
Trademark
Patent Search
License vs Manufacture My Invention Idea
How To Patent and Sell an Invention Idea
Client Success Stories
FAQ


Client Reviews


For Companies

Why Partner w/ Inventors
Virtual Tradeshow


Invention Blog
 Search










Free Idea Review
How to Get Started




Inventor Resources
Click here for insider tips for inventors to learn how to patent, develop, license, and sell their inventions.
The path from idea to success is complicated, but with the right guidance you can navigate confidently. Everything you need to patent, develop and sell your invention under one roof.











Patent Search Packages
Before you begin patenting and marketing your invention idea, it is vital to do your research first.
Trust our proven process that has helped in getting over 1,000 patents ISSUED. View our Patent Search packages here.






Patent Application Packages
What kind of patent do you require?
We provide patent services for not only Provisional Patents like other companies, but also Utility Patents, Design Patents, Trademarks, and Copyrights as well. Click here to see our different package costs.










Marketing Packages
Take your product to the next level with our professional marketing services.
We provide different packages based on your budget to market your invention idea. Including virtual prototypes, website listings, brochures, and even your own Youtube video with a voiceover.


A brief overview of the process.
The path from idea to success is complicated, but with the right guidance you can navigate confidently. We start with the quickest and least expensive methods to help you, the inventor save time and money.


1) Get the free patent kit
The kit is an easy-to-read PDF that is the fastest way to get you up to speed on the basics of the invention patenting process. Get your free patent kit here!
 
2) Get your invention idea reviewed for free.
After you download your kit, you should fill out the Official Record of Invention form. This confidential form is reviewed by our team. You will get the chance to speak to an invention consultant, for free, to discuss your recommendations.
 
3) Get started!
After you’ve gotten your free kit and had your free consultation, you can then take some time and decide which of our recommendations you’d like to pursue. We will explain costs and expectations and help you every step of the way.
Of course, no one can predict or guarantee the success of any invention, but we can help you get started and put your best foot forward and avoid costly mistakes.
Share this Post





 


Send My Free Patent Kit








  First Name:

  Last Name:

  Email

  Phone








   Click here for a free invention review.  
Most PopularWhat Is A Patent?
How To Patent and Sell an Invention Idea
How Much Does A Patent Cost?
Invention Licensing for Royalties
Patent Search Packages
Patent Application Cost
Categories 
China

Filing Patent Applications

How-To

Invention Ideas

Invention Infographics

Invention Marketing

Invention News

Invention Scams

Invention Tradeshows

Inventions and Inventors

Inventor Education

Marketing Corner

Newsletter Archive

Patent and Trademark Thoughts

Patent Attorney

Patent Cost

Patent Engineering

Patent, Trademark, Copyright

Shark Tank

Spotlight Inventor

Uncategorized

Whiteboard Wednesday


 







Type and Press “enter” to Search





 







 




















Nothing found for  Services ?utm_Source=Bing&utm_Medium=Cpc&utm_Term=%2Bnew%20%2Bproduct&utm_Campaign=Fsbi_Gen&matchtype=B&distribution=Search&adid=%7Bcreative%7D&adpos=%7Badposition%7D&device=C&devmod=%7Bdevicemodel%7D&placement=%7Bplacement%7D





























































 







 









Navigation



For Inventors

Inventor Resources
Professional Services

Provisional Patent
Utility Patent
Design Patent
Patent Drafting
Licensing
Research and Development
Engineering
Prototyping


Packages

Patent Search Packages
Patent Licensing Packages


Education

How To Get Started
Patent
Copyright
Trademark
Patent Search
License vs Manufacture My Invention Idea
How To Patent and Sell an Invention Idea
Client Success Stories
FAQ


Client Reviews


For Companies

Why Partner w/ Inventors
Virtual Tradeshow


Invention Blog
 Search






Oops!
You blew up the Internet. 




The page you are looking for is no longer here, or never existed in the first place (bummer). You can try searching for what you are looking for using the form below. If that still doesn't provide the results you are looking for, you can always start over from the home page.

Search











Type and Press “enter” to Search





 







 


















Free Inventor Kit | Lead Landing Page













































 


 










Research, Patent & Sell Your Invention Idea

PATENT YOUR INVENTION… BEFORE SOMEBODY ELSE DOES











 SEND MY FREE PATENT KIT









First Name


Last Name


Email



Phone Number





• Full Service Agency for Inventors
• Free Consultation. 100% Safe.
• Avoid Common Inventor Mistakes.









Grab Free Patent Kit & Discover:

New patent laws favor 1st inventor to file
No 2nd place prizes at the Patent Office
Holiday buying season is once a year


















From idea to 
retail stores
















How It Works
We start with the quickest and least expensive methods to help inventors save time and money.
1) Start by downloading our free eBook & Inventor Kit.
2) Get your invention idea reviewed for free.
3) Get started on your journey!
If you make a decision to use any of our services, you will be covered by our money back customer service promise. We can help you put your best foot forward and avoid costly mistakes.










WHAT IS YOUR BIG INVENTION IDEA?
Launch it with just a simple rough sketch






 Sketch
A simple rough sketch of your idea is all you need to get started with patent research & free consultation


 Patent
Getting patents ISSUED is the issue - instead of worthless filings  by non-licensed attorney/agents


 Sell
Bring your idea to life with a 3D prototype and introduce it to the world fast and easy
 











Real Patent Pros
All Provisional, Design & Utility Patent Applications handled in-house






Real Engineers
Fully engineered patent applications to exceed USPTO standards






Real Marketing Experts
Promote your invention to industry for sale or license for royalties





 







Scroll up

			Wordpress 		SEO
		 Plugin by 		SEOPressor




















Free Invention Review | For Sale By Inventor
































































































 







 









Navigation



For Inventors

Inventor Resources
Professional Services

Provisional Patent
Utility Patent
Design Patent
Patent Drafting
Licensing
Research and Development
Engineering
Prototyping


Packages

Patent Search Packages
Patent Licensing Packages


Education

How To Get Started
Patent
Copyright
Trademark
Patent Search
License vs Manufacture My Invention Idea
How To Patent and Sell an Invention Idea
Client Success Stories
FAQ


Client Reviews


For Companies

Why Partner w/ Inventors
Virtual Tradeshow


Invention Blog
 Search










Free Invention Review



Complete this form for a free, no obligation review of your idea.

Non Disclosure Agreement
Official Record of Invention Form
Statement Of Non-Disclosure and Complete Confidentiality
Complete this form for a free, no obligation review of your idea.
This Record of Invention Form certifies that you are the originator of the invention disclosed, including all additional information submitted moving forward from this date. This Non-Disclosure Agreement certifies that nobody within or associated with For Sale By Inventor may knowingly manufacture, sell, distribute or attempt to profit from your invention in any way from the date you submit your invention.

The information you submit may be shared with a separate patent law firm, Montgomery Patent & Design to evaluate patentability and intellectual property rights. The information shared with Montgomery Patent & Design will be bound by attorney client privilege.

All employees and representatives of For Sale By Inventor, including all related companies within the Montgomery IP Associates family of companies, are required to sign confidentiality agreements to ensure complete confidence for you and your invention idea.

*A digitally time-dated copy of your Record of Invention will be sent to you by email immediately upon submission for your records.















Why fill out this form?Watch 0.40 sec video





A picture is worth a thousand words.Increase your chances of success by helping us see your vision. Upload a sketch of your idea. Pen and paper and a cellphone camera is all you need.




Invention Name






Invention Description
	Please include as much info as possible about what it is, how it works, have you made a model or prototype? What if anything have you done toward getting it patented?





First Name





Last Name





Best Phone







Email





Second Inventor:

First Name





Last Name






Third Inventor:

First Name





Last Name






Fourth Inventor:

First Name





Last Name






Fifth Inventor:

First Name





Last Name














Address





City





State



                    (Select One)
                

                    Alabama
                

                    Alberta
                

                    Alaska
                

                    Arizona
                 

                    Arkansas
                

                    British Columbia
                

                    California
                

                    Colorado
                

                    Connecticut
                

                    Delaware
                

                    Florida
                

                    Georgia
                

                    Hawaii
                

                    Idaho
                

                    Illinois
                

                    Indiana
                

                    Iowa
                

                    Kansas
                

                    Kentucky
                

                    Louisiana
                

                    Maine
                

                    Manitoba
                

                    Maryland
                

                    Massachusetts
                

                    Michigan
                

                    Minnesota
                

                    Mississippi
                

                    Missouri
                

                    Montana
                

                    Nebraska
                

                    Nevada
                

                    Newfoundland and Labrador
                

                    New Brunswick
                

                    New Hampshire
                

                    New Jersey
                

                    New Mexico
                

                    New York
                

                    Northwest Territories
                

                    North Carolina
                

                    North Dakota
                

                    Nova Scotia
                

                    Nunavut
                

                    Ohio
                

                    Oklahoma
                

                    Ontario
                

                    Oregon
                

                    Pennsylvania
                

                    Prince Edward Island
                

                    Quebec
                

                    Rhode Island
                

                    Saskatchewan
                

                    South Carolina
                

                    South Dakota
                

                    Tennessee
                

                    Texas
                

                    Utah
                

                    Vermont
                

                    Virginia
                

                    Washington
                

                    Washington, DC
                

                    West Virginia
                

                    Wisconsin
                

                    Wyoming
                

                    Yukon
                





ZIP Code





Country


(Select One)
United States
Canada
Australia
New Zealand
United Kingdom







Upload Photo, Drawing or Sketch





You can send via Fax
724.745.0228


Or via text or email

Mail@forsalebyinventor.com



For Sale By Inventor Inventor Disclosure Your ideas are safe.



The purpose of the Inventor Disclosure is to inform inventors that the process of creating a new product/concept and developing it into a commercial success is extremely difficult, time consuming, often frustrating, confusing and usually costly. To succeed, inventors normally must accomplish, at a high level: the legal process (patents, copyrights, trademarks, etc); engineering, scientific or technical factors; production concerns; and, market distribution.  For an individual inventor, this can be a daunting task and should be carefully considered before risking talents, time, energies and capital.
Although an inventor can always represent themselves, inventors are strongly encouraged to seek advice and assistance only from licensed professionals. For Sale By Inventor’s mission is to provide coordinated, professional services for inventors to help launch their invention ideas into new products onto the market.
For Sale By Inventor specializes in consulting, researching and educating small and micro entity inventors. For Sale By Inventor never evaluates an invention in terms of potential marketability.
For Sale By Inventor refers all patent and engineering work to Montgomery Patent & Design on behalf of inventor clients. Advertising, virtual prototypes, websites and representation services are provided by Advertising – Generation, LLC through their proprietary website ForSaleByInventor.com.  This process ensures a coordinated effort and complete confidentiality.
For Sale By Inventor and any related entities neither singularly nor collectively, considers itself to be an invention promoter or developer; regardless, the following is disclosed in the spirit of full disclosure.
The total number of inventors who contacted For Sale By Inventor and any related entities over the past 5 years is approximately 125,000; from that total, approximately 60,000 submitted ideas for review with about 12,000 offered contracts for research services; resulting in 3,974 contracting for professional research services. Following research, 2,162 received positive professional opinions of patentability and feasibility and were proffered development agreements. 1,127 inventors contracted for some combination of our patent, engineering and marketing services.
Of the total clients contracting for our services, 53 received licensing agreements and 27 have reported a net financial profit while hundreds of cases still remain active. Licensing is just one option that an inventor can pursue to commercialize their invention and was not pursued by clients who only contracted for legal, engineering or sales representation services. An additional 182 inventions have reported commercial success meaning that they either have been or are currently available for sale. Since these clients have no obligation to report their specific financial records to us, we are not aware of how many of these have made more than they spent on their invention.
DISCLAIMER: Past performance of professional services can provide no guarantee of future profits or that anyone will agree to purchase, license, produce or distribute any invention idea. Bringing an invention from an idea to marketed product is a high risk venture.
rev.  7/2017

 
I have read the For Sale By Inventor Inventor Disclosure and want my free review.



I certify, to the best of my knowledge, that I am not aware of any individual or entity who is adverse to me attempting to patent this invention. 
 Yes 
 No 


Please list all individuals/entities who might be adverse to you attempting to patent this product. Include contact information.



 - Denotes Required Field.




















      

Share this Post











Type and Press “enter” to Search





 







 






























New Media Investment Group

































































Home
About
Markets
Commercial Services
Investor Relations
Contact

























 





130 DAILY AND HUNDREDS OF COMMUNITY PUBLICATIONS 

PHOTO BY ANDY ABEYTA, JOURNAL STAR, PEORIA, IL

 







656 PUBLICATIONS ACROSS 36 STATES 

PHOTO BY MERRILY CASSIDY, CAPE COD TIMES, HYANNIS, MA 







PRINT AND DIGITAL PRODUCTS REACHMORE THAN 23 MILLION PEOPLE, EACH WEEK 

PHOTO BY RON JOHNSON, JOURNAL STAR, PEORIA, IL 







PHOTO BY CHRISTOPHER MILLETTE, ERIE TIMES-NEWS, ERIE, PA
 

744K DAILY SUBSCRIPTIONS827K SUNDAY SUBSCRIPTIONS 







41 MILLION UNIQUE VISITORS,253 MILLION PAGE VIEWS EACH MONTH 

PHOTO BY ERIC ALBRECHT, THE COLUMBUS DISPATCH, COLUMBUS, OH 







SERVE MORE THAN 225K SMALL
AND MEDIUM-SIZED BUSINESSES 

PHOTO BY JIM TILLER, DAYTONA BEACH NEWS-JOURNAL, DAYTONA BEACH, FL 







555+ LOCAL MARKET WEBSITES 

PHOTO BY ALAN YOUNGBLOOD, OCALA STAR-BANNER, OCALA, FL 







LARGEST PUBLISHER OF DAILY NEWSPAPERS ACROSS THE U.S.BY NUMBER OF DAILY PUBLICATIONS 

PHOTO BY TINA RUSSELL, OBSERVER-DISPATCH, UTICA, NY 



 




Recent News & Events
New Media Completes the Acquisition of Harris Enterprises for $20.4 Million
New Media Announces Pricing of Public Offering of Common Stock
New Media Announces Public Offering of Common Stock

More…
Market Summary
NYSE : NEWM $13.35Change($            0.36)Change2.63%Market Value ($M) 715.75Volume 556,283As of Jul 26, 2017 (minimum 20 minute delay)
Awards


GateHouse Media newspapers recognized by Associated Press Media Editors
Norwich Bulletin honored by Society of Professional Journalists
Columbus Dispatch’s Nate Beeler recognized with Sigma Delta Chi Award

More…








Most popular stories across our publications



Middletown police seeking the public's assistance in locating sex offender - News - Middletown Transcript - Middletown, DE



Ask the DMV: Expired learner’s permits can be renewed, within limits - Business - providencejournal.com - Providence, RI



Orange County Choppers headquarters to be auctioned off - News - recordonline.com - Middletown, NY



Benjamin Moore rolls out 'Store of the future' in Sarasota - Business - Sarasota Herald-Tribune - Sarasota, FL



Police: 16-year-old forced girl, 12, to perform oral sex at Colchester park - News - The Bulletin - Norwich, CT



Florida's Friday Night Lights proves fruitful | Gatorsports.com



Family of woman who rammed cop cars: 'We tried to help' - News - Gaston Gazette - Gastonia, NC



Top QB prospect picks Florida; two more make commitment | Gatorsports.com



SEAN P. RIORDAN - Obituaries - recordonline.com - Middletown, NY



Springfield man accused of drunken driving during fatal crash was on parole, had previous DUI - News - The State Journal-Register - Springfield, IL

 

 






 








 


Contact Us

New Media
			1345 Avenue of the Americas
			45th Floor
			New York, NY 10105
			212.479.3160
ir@newmediainv.com










Copyright 2016 New Media Investment Group, All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy

















Home
About
Markets
Commercial Services
Investor Relations
Contact






































Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


